!07/11 PDP a ni deppart m'I !pleH
(1) Everything depends. (2) Nothing is always. (3) Everything is sometimes.
1.79 x 10^12 furlongs per fortnight -- it's not just a good idea, it's the law!
10.0 times 0.1 is hardly ever 1.0.
which time it will be worth absolutely nothing. -- Lazarus Long, "Time Enough for Love"
186,282 miles per second:  It isn't just a good idea, it's the law!
2180, U.S. History question: What 20th Century U.S. President was almost impeached and what office did he later hold?
$3,000,000
"355/113 -- Not the famous irrational number PI, but an incredible simulation!"
43rd Law of Computing: Anything that can go wr fortune: Segmentation violation -- Core dumped
7:30, Channel 5: The Bionic Dog (Action/Adventure) The Bionic Dog drinks too much and kicks over the National Redwood Forest.
A baby is an alimentary canal with a loud voice at one end and no responsibility at the other.
A baby is God's opinion that the world should go on. -- Carl Sandburg
A bachelor is a selfish, undeserving guy who has cheated some woman out of a divorce. -- Don Quinn
A banker is a fellow who lends you his umbrella when the sun is shining and wants it back the minute it begins to rain. -- Mark Twain
A billion here, a couple of billion there -- first thing you know it adds up to be real money. -- Senator Everett McKinley Dirksen
A bird in the bush usually has a friend in there with him.
A bird in the hand is worth what it will bring.
A bird in the hand makes it awfully hard to blow your nose.
... A booming voice says, "Wrong, cretin!", and you notice that you have turned into a pile of dust.
A bore is someone who persists in holding his own views after we have enlightened him with ours.
A budget is just a method of worrying before you spend money, as well as afterward.
A candidate is a person who gets money from the rich and votes from the poor to protect them from each other.
A celebrity is a person who is known for his well-knownness.
A child of five could understand this! Fetch me a child of five.
A chubby man with a white beard and a red suit will approach you soon. Avoid him. He's a Commie.
A citizen of America will cross the ocean to fight for democracy, but won't cross the street to vote in a national election. -- Bill Vaughan
A city is a large community where people are lonesome together -- Herbert Prochnow
A classic is something that everybody wants to have read and nobody wants to read. -- Mark Twain
A closed mouth gathers no foot.
A conclusion is simply the place where someone got tired of thinking.
A CONS is an object which cares. -- Bernie Greenberg.
A consultant is a person who borrows your watch, tells you what time it is, pockets the watch, and sends you a bill for it.
A continuing flow of paper is sufficient to continue the flow of paper. -- Dyer
A copy of the universe is not what is required of art; one of the damned things is ample. -- Rebecca West
A countryman between two lawyers is like a fish between two cats. -- Ben Franklin
A cynic is a person searching for an honest man, with a stolen lantern. -- Edgar A. Shoaff
A day for firm decisions!!!!! Or is it?
A day without sunshine is like night.
A diplomat is a man who can convince his wife she'd look stout in a fur coat.
A diplomat is someone who can tell you to go to hell in such a way that you will look forward to the trip.
A diva who specializes in risqu'e arias is an off-coloratura soprano ...
A door is what a dog is perpetually on the wrong side of. -- Ogden Nash
A fanatic is one who can't change his mind and won't change the subject. -- Winston Churchill
A fool must now and then be right by chance.
A fool's brain digests philosophy into folly, science into superstition, and art into pedantry. Hence University education. -- G. B. Shaw
A fool-proof method for sculpting an elephant: first, get a huge block of marble; then you chip away everything that doesn't look like an elephant.
A formal parsing algorithm should not always be used. -- D. Gries
A free society is one where it is safe to be unpopular. -- Adlai Stevenson
A general leading the State Department resembles a dragon commanding ducks. -- New York Times, Jan. 20, 1981
A gleekzorp without a tornpee is like a quop without a fertsneet (sort of).
A great many people think they are thinking when they are merely rearranging their prejudices. -- William James
A great nation is any mob of people which produces at least one honest man a century.
A journey of a thousand miles begins with a cash advance.
A jury consists of 12 persons chosen to decide who has the better lawyer. -- Robert Frost
A lack of leadership is no substitute for inaction.
A lack of leadership is no substitute for inaction.
A lack of leadership is no substitute for inaction.
A language that doesn't affect the way you think about programming is not worth knowing.
A language that doesn't have everything is actually easier to program in than some that do. -- Dennis M. Ritchie
A large number of installed systems work by fiat. That is, they work by being declared to work. -- Anatol Holt
A Law of Computer Programming: Make it possible for programmers to write in English and you will find the programmers cannot write in English.
A LISP programmer knows the value of everything, but the cost of nothing.
A little inaccuracy sometimes saves tons of explanation. -- H. H. Munroe
A long memory is the most subversive idea in America.
A long-forgotten loved one will appear soon. Buy the negatives at any price.
A lot of people are afraid of heights. Not me. I'm afraid of widths. -- Steve Wright
A lot of people I know believe in positive thinking, and so do I. I believe everything positively stinks. -- Lew Col
A man said to the Universe: "Sir, I exist!"  "However," replied the Universe, "the fact has not created in me a sense of obligation." -- Stephen Crane
A man wrapped up in himself makes a very small package.
A mathematician is a machine for converting coffee into theorems.
A new dramatist of the absurd Has a voice that will shortly be heard. I learn from my spies He's about to devise An unprintable three-letter word.
A new koan:  If you have some ice cream, I will give it to you.  If you have no ice cream, I will take it away from you.  It is an ice cream koan.
A New York City ordinance prohibits the shooting of rabbits from the rear of a Third Avenue street car -- if the car is in motion.
A nuclear war can ruin your whole day.
A pedestal is as much a prison as any small, confined space. -- Gloria Steinem
A penny saved is ridiculous.
A person is just about as big as the things that make them angry.
A physicist is an atom's way of knowing about atoms. -- George Wald
"A power so great, it can only be used for Good or Evil!" -- Firesign Theatre, "The Giant Rat of Summatra"
A professor is one who talks in someone else's sleep.
A psychiatrist is a person who will give you expensive answers that your wife will give you for free.
"A raccoon tangled with a 23,000 volt line today. The results blacked out 1400 homes and, of course, one raccoon." -- Steel City News
"A radioactive cat has eighteen half-lives."
A real patriot is the fellow who gets a parking ticket and rejoices that the system works.
A real person has two reasons for doing anything ... a good reason and the real reason.
A Riverside, California, health ordinance states that two persons may not kiss each other without first wiping their lips with carbolized rosewater.
A rock pile ceases to be a rock pile the moment a single man contemplates it, bearing within him the image of a cathedral. -- Antoine de Saint-Exupery
A sine curve goes off to infinity or at least the end of the blackboard -- Prof. Steiner
... A solemn, unsmiling, sanctimonious old iceberg who looked like he was waiting for a vacancy in the Trinity. -- Mark Twain
A straw vote only shows which way the hot air blows. -- O'Henry
A strong conviction that something must be done is the parent of many bad measures. -- Daniel Webster
A student who changes the course of history is probably taking an exam.
A successful [software] tool is one that was used to do something undreamed of by its author. -- S. C. Johnson
A tautology is a thing which is tautological.
A transistor protected by a fast-acting fuse will protect the fuse by blowing first.
A triangle which has an angle of 135 degrees is called an obscene triangle.
A truly wise man never plays leapfrog with a unicorn.
A university is what a college becomes when the faculty loses interest in students. -- John Ciardi
"A University without students is like an ointment without a fly." -- Ed Nather, professor of astronomy at UT Austin
A vacuum is a hell of a lot better than some of the stuff that nature replaces it with. -- Tennessee Williams
A very intelligent turtle Found programming UNIX a hurdle The system, you see, Ran as slow as did he, And that's not saying much for the turtle.
A well adjusted person is one who makes the same mistake twice without getting nervous.
A witty saying proves nothing, but saying something pointless gets people's attention.
"A witty saying proves nothing." -- Voltaire
A year spent in artificial intelligence is enough to make one believe in God.
A.A.A.A.A.: An organization for drunks who drive
AAAAAAAAAaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaccccccccckkkkkk!!!!!!!!! You brute! Knock before entering a ladies room!
Abandon the search for Truth; settle for a good fantasy.
"About the time we think we can make ends meet, somebody moves the ends." -- Herbert Hoover
Absence makes the heart go wander.
Absent, adj.: Exposed to the attacks of friends and acquaintances; defamed; slandered.
Abstainer, n.: A weak person who yields to the temptation of denying himself a pleasure. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Absurdity, n.: A statement or belief manifestly inconsistent with one's own opinion. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Academic politics is the most vicious and bitter form of politics, because the stakes are so low. -- Wallace Sayre
Accident, n.: A condition in which presence of mind is good, but absence of body is better.
According to Kentucky state law, every person must take a bath at least once a year.
According to my best recollection, I don't remember. -- Vincent "Jimmy Blue Eyes" Alo
totally worthless.
According to the obituary notices, a mean and unimportant person never dies.
Accordion, n.: A bagpipe with pleats.
Accuracy, n.: The vice of being right
Acid -- better living through chemistry.
Acid absorbs 47 times it's weight in excess Reality.
Acquaintance, n.: A person whom we know well enough to borrow from, but not well enough to lend to. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
"Acting is an art which consists of keeping the audience from coughing."
Actors will happen even in the best-regulated families.
ADA, n.: Something you need only know the name of to be an Expert in Computing. Useful in sentences like, "We had better develop an ADA awareness."
Admiration, n.: Our polite recognition of another's resemblance to ourselves. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Adolescence, n.: The stage between puberty and adultery.
"Adopted kids are such a pain -- you have to teach them how to look like you ..." -- Gilda Radner
Adore, v.: To venerate expectantly. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Adult, n.: One old enough to know better.
Advertising is a valuable economic factor because it is the cheapest way of selling goods, particularly if the goods are worthless. -- Sinclair Lewis
Advice to young men: Be ascetic, and if you can't be ascetic, then at least be asceptic.
After a number of decimal places, nobody gives a damn.
"... After all, all he did was string together a lot of old, well-known quotations." -- H. L. Mencken, on Shakespeare
After an instrument has been assembled, extra components will be found on the bench.
After I run your program, let's make love like crazed weasels, OK?
After living in New York, you trust nobody, but you believe everything. Just in case.
After the last of 16 mounting screws has been removed from an access cover, it will be discovered that the wrong access cover has been removed.
Afternoon very favorable for romance. Try a single person for a change.
Afternoon, n.: That part of the day we spend worrying about how we wasted the morning.
Age before beauty; and pearls before swine. -- Dorothy Parker
Ah say, son, you're about as sharp as a bowlin' ball.
Air is water with holes in it
Alas, I am dying beyond my means. -- Oscar Wilde, as he sipped champagne on his deathbed
Alden's Laws: (1) Giving away baby clothes and furniture is the major cause of pregnancy. (2) Always be backlit. (3) Sit down whenever possible.
Aleph-null bottles of beer on the wall, Aleph-null bottles of beer, You take one down, and pass it around, Aleph-null bottles of beer on the wall.
Alex Haley was adopted!
Alexander Graham Bell is alive and well in New York, and still waiting for a dial tone.
Alimony is a system by which, when two people make a mistake, one of them keeps paying for it. -- Peggy Joyce
All bridge hands are equally likely, but some are more equally likely than others. -- Alan Truscott
All extremists should be taken out and shot.
All Finagle Laws may be bypassed by learning the simple art of doing without thinking.
"All flesh is grass" -- Isiah Smoke a friend today.
All I ask is a chance to prove that money can't make me happy.
All I ask of life is a constant and exaggerated sense of my own importance.
All I can think of is a platter of organic PRUNE CRISPS being trampled by an army of swarthy, Italian LOUNGE SINGERS ...
All I want is a warm bed and a kind word and unlimited power -- Ashleigh Brilliant
All men are mortal. Socrates was mortal. Therefore, all men are Socrates. -- Woody Allen
"All my friends and I are crazy. That's the only thing that keeps us sane."
"All my life I wanted to be someone; I guess I should have been more specific." -- Jane Wagner
All of the true things I am about to tell you are shameless lies. -- The Book of Bokonon / Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
All other things being equal, a bald man cannot be elected President of the United States. -- Vic Gold
All power corrupts, but we need electricity.
All programmers are playwrights and all computers are lousy actors.
All progress is based upon a universal innate desire on the part of every organism to live beyond its income. -- Samuel Butler
All science is either physics or stamp collecting. -- E. Rutherford
"All snakes who wish to remain in Ireland will please raise their right hands." -- Saint Patrick
All syllogisms have three parts, therefore this is not a syllogism.
"... all the modern inconveniences ..." -- Mark Twain
All the passions make us commit faults; love makes us commit the most ridiculous ones. -- La Rochefoucauld
All the taxes paid over a lifetime by the average American are spent by the government in less than a second. -- Jim Fiebig
All the world's a stage and most of us are desperately unrehearsed. -- Sean O'Casey
All theoretical chemistry is really physics; and all theoretical chemists know it. -- Richard P. Feynman
All things are possible, except skiing thru a revolving door.
All this wheeling and dealing around, why, it isn't for money, it's for fun. Money's just the way we keep score.
All true wisdom is found on T-shirts.
Alone, adj.: In bad company. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Although golf was originally restricted to wealthy, overweight Protestants, today it's open to anybody who owns hideous clothing. -- Dave Barry
Although the moon is smaller than the earth, it is farther away.
Always borrow money from a pessimist; he doesn't expect to be paid back.
Always remember that you are unique. Just like everyone else.
"Always try to do things in chronological order; it's less confusing that way."
Am I ranting? I hope so. My ranting gets raves.
AMAZING BUT TRUE ...  There is so much sand in Northern Africa that if it were spread out it would completely cover the Sahara Desert.
Ambidextrous, adj.: Able to pick with equal skill a right-hand pocket or a left. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Ambition is a poor excuse for not having sense enough to be lazy. -- Charlie McCarthy
America may be unique in being a country which has leapt from barbarism to decadence without touching civilization. -- John O'Hara
"Amnesia used to be my favorite word, but then I forgot it."
An age is called Dark not because the light fails to shine, but because people refuse to see it. -- James Michener, "Space"
An American's a person who isn't afraid to criticize the President but is always polite to traffic cops.
An apple every eight hours will keep three doctors away.
An artist should be fit for the best society and keep out of it.
An authority is a person who can tell you more about something than you really care to know.
An effective way to deal with predators is to taste terrible.
An elephant is a mouse with an operating system.
An Englishman never enjoys himself, except for a noble purpose. -- A. P. Herbert
An exotic journey in downtown Newark is in your future.
"... an experienced, industrious, ambitious, and often quite often picturesque liar." -- Mark Twain
An idea is not responsible for the people who believe in it.
"An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of purge."
Anarchy may not be the best form of government, but it's better than no government at all.
... and furthermore ... I don't like your trousers.
And I heard Jeff exclaim, As they strolled out of sight, "Merry Christmas to all -- You take credit cards, right?" -- "Outsiders" comic
... And malt does more than Milton can To justify God's ways to man -- A. E. Housman
And on the seventh day, He exited from append mode.
"... And remember: if you don't like the news, go out and make some of your own." -- "Scoop" Nisker, KFOG radio reporter Preposterous Words
"...and the fully armed nuclear warheads, are, of course, merely a courtesy detail."
"And what will you do when you grow up to be as big as me?" asked the father of his little son. "Diet."
Andrea: Unhappy the land that has no heroes. Galileo: No, unhappy the land that _____needs heroes. -- Bertolt Brecht, "Life of Galileo"
Angels we have heard on High Tell us to go out and Buy. -- Tom Lehrer
Ankh if you love Isis.
Anoint, v.: To grease a king or other great functionary already sufficiently slippery. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Another good night not to sleep in a eucalyptus tree.
Anthony's Law of Force: Don't force it; get a larger hammer.
Antonym, n.: The opposite of the word you're trying to think of.
Any clod can have the facts, but having an opinion is an art. -- Charles McCabe
Any clod can have the facts, but having opinions is an art. -- Charles McCabe
Any excuse will serve a tyrant. -- Aesop
Any father who thinks he's all important should remind himself that this country honors fathers only one day a year while pickles get a whole week.
Any fool can paint a picture, but it takes a wise person to be able to sell it.
Any philosophy that can be put in a nutshell belongs there. -- Sydney J. Harris
Any small object that is accidentally dropped will hide under a larger object.
Any stone in your boot always migrates against the pressure gradient to exactly the point of most pressure. -- Milt Barber
Any sufficiently advanced bug is indistinguishable from a feature. -- Rich Kulawiec
Any sufficiently advanced technology is indistinguishable from a rigged demo.
Any sufficiently advanced technology is indistinguishable from magic. -- Arthur C. Clarke
Any time things appear to be going better, you have overlooked something.
Any two philosophers can tell each other all they know in two hours. -- Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr.
Anybody can win, unless there happens to be a second entry.
Anybody who doesn't cut his speed at the sight of a police car is probably parked.
Anybody with money to burn will easily find someone to tend the fire.
Anyone can do any amount of work provided it isn't the work he is supposed to be doing at the moment. -- Robert Benchley
Anyone can hold the helm when the sea is calm. -- Publius Syrus
Anyone can make an omelet with eggs. The trick is to make one with none.
Anyone who goes to a psychiatrist ought to have his head examined. -- Samuel Goldwyn
Anyone who hates Dogs and Kids Can't be All Bad. -- W. C. Fields
Anyone who uses the phrase "easy as taking candy from a baby" has never tried taking candy from a baby. -- Robin Hood
Anything free is worth what you pay for it.
Anything is good and useful if it's made of chocolate.
Anything is good if it's made of chocolate.
Anything that is good and useful is made of chocolate.
Anything worth doing is worth overdoing
"Apathy is not the problem, it's the solution"
Aphorism, n.: A concise, clever statement. Afterism, n.: A concise, clever statement you don't think of until too late. -- James Alexander Thom
"APL is a write-only language. I can write programs in APL, but I can't read any of them." -- Roy Keir
Aquadextrous, adj.: Possessing the ability to turn the bathtub faucet on and off with your toes. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Arbitrary systems, pl.n.: Systems about which nothing general can be said, save "nothing general can be said."
ARCHDUKE FERDINAND FOUND ALIVE -- FIRST WORLD WAR A MISTAKE
Are you a turtle?
Are you a turtle?
"Arguments with furniture are rarely productive." -- Kehlog Albran, "The Profit"
Arithmetic is being able to count up to twenty without taking off your shoes. -- Mickey Mouse
Armadillo: To provide weapons to a Spanish pickle
Art is anything you can get away with. -- Marshall McLuhan.
Art is either plagiarism or revolution. -- Paul Gauguin
Artistic ventures highlighted. Rob a museum.
As far as we know, our computer has never had an undetected error. -- Weisert
As long as the answer is right, who cares if the question is wrong?
As of next week, passwords will be entered in Morse code.
As the poet said, "Only God can make a tree" -- probably because it's so hard to figure out how to get the bark on. -- Woody Allen
As the trials of life continue to take their toll, remember that there is always a future in Computer Maintenance. -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
As Will Rogers would have said, "There is no such things as a free variable."
As Zeus said to Narcissus, "Watch yourself."
ASHes to ASHes, DOS to DOS.
Ask five economists and you'll get five different explanations (six if one went to Harvard). -- Edgar R. Fiedler
Ask not for whom the <CONTROL-G> tolls.
Ask Not for whom the Bell Tolls, and You will Pay only the Station-to-Station rate.
Ask not for whom the telephone bell tolls ... if thou art in the bathtub, it tolls for thee.
Ask your boss to reconsider -- it's so difficult to take "Go to hell" for an answer.
Ass, n.: The masculine of "lass".
... at least I thought I was dancing, 'til somebody stepped on my hand. -- J. B. White
"At least they're ___________EXPERIENCED incompetents"
At no time is freedom of speech more precious than when a man hits his thumb with a hammer. -- Marshall Lumsden
Atlanta makes it against the law to tie a giraffe to a telephone pole or street lamp.
Atlee is a very modest man. And with reason. -- Winston Churchill
Authors (and perhaps columnists) eventually rise to the top of whatever depths they were once able to plumb. -- Stanley Kaufman
Automobile, n.: A four-wheeled vehicle that runs up hills and down pedestrians.
Avoid Quiet and Placid persons unless you are in Need of Sleep. -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
Avoid reality at all costs.
Bacchus, n.: A convenient deity invented by the ancients as an excuse for getting drunk. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Baker's First Law of Federal Geometry: A block grant is a solid mass of money surrounded on all sides by governors.
Ban the bomb. Save the world for conventional warfare.
Banectomy, n.: The removal of bruises on a banana. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Bank error in your favor. Collect $200.
Barach's Rule: An alcoholic is a person who drinks more than his own physician.
Bare feet magnetize sharp metal objects so they point upward from the floor -- especially in the dark.
Barometer, n.: An ingenious instrument which indicates what kind of weather we are having. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Barth's Distinction: There are two types of people: those who divide people into two types, and those who don't.
Baruch's Observation: If all you have is a hammer, everything looks like a nail.
Baseball is a skilled game. It's America's game -- it, and high taxes. -- Will Rogers
Basic is a high level languish. APL is a high level anguish.
"BASIC is the Computer Science equivalent of `Scientific Creationism'."
Basic, n.: A programming language. Related to certain social diseases in that those who have it will not admit it in polite company.
Bathquake, n.: The violent quake that rattles the entire house when the water faucet is turned on to a certain point. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Be a better psychiatrist and the world will beat a psychopath to your door.
BE ALERT!!!! (The world needs more lerts ...)
Be braver -- you can't cross a chasm in two small jumps.
Be careful of reading health books, you might die of a misprint. -- Mark Twain
Be different: conform.
Be free and open and breezy! Enjoy! Things won't get any better so get used to it.
Be security conscious -- National defense is at stake.
Be wary of strong drink. It can make you shoot at tax collectors and miss -- Lazarus Long, "Time Enough for Love"
Bees are very busy souls They have no time for birth controls And that is why in times like these There are so many Sons of Bees.
Before Xerox, five carbons were the maximum extension of anybody's ego.
Begathon, n.: A multi-day event on public television, used to raise money so you won't have to watch commercials.
Behold the warranty ... the bold print giveth and the fine print taketh away.
"Being disintegrated makes me ve-ry an-gry!" <huff, huff>
"Being disintegrated makes me ve-ry an-gry!" <huff, huff>
Bell Labs Unix -- Reach out and grep someone.
"Benson, you are so free of the ravages of intelligence" -- Time Bandits
Best of all is never to have been born. Second best is to die soon.
Better dead than mellow.
"Beware of bugs in the above code; I have only proved it correct, not tried it." -- Donald Knuth
Beware of computerized fortune-tellers!
Beware of low-flying butterflies.
Beware of Programmers who carry screwdrivers. -- Leonard Brandwein
Beware of self-styled experts: an ex is a has-been, and a spurt is a drip under pressure.
Beware of the Turing Tar-pit in which everything is possible but nothing of interest is easy.
Binary, adj.: Possessing the ability to have friends of both sexes.
"Biology is the only science in which multiplication means the same thing as division."
Bipolar, adj.: Refers to someone who has homes in Nome, Alaska, and Buffalo, New York
Birth, n.: The first and direst of all disasters. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Bizarreness is the essence of the exotic
Bizoos, n.: The millions of tiny individual bumps that make up a basketball. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
... bleakness ... desolation ... plastic forks ...
Blessed are the young for they shall inherit the national debt.
Blessed are they who Go Around in Circles, for they Shall be Known as Wheels.
BLISS is ignorance
Blood flows down one leg and up the other.
Blood is thicker than water, and much tastier.
Blore's Razor: Given a choice between two theories, take the one which is funnier.
Boling's postulate: If you're feeling good, don't worry. You'll get over it.
Bolub's Fourth Law of Computerdom: Project teams detest weekly progress reporting because it so vividly manifests their lack of progress.
Bombeck's Rule of Medicine: Never go to a doctor whose office plants have died.
BOO! We changed Coke again! BLEAH! BLEAH!
Boob's Law: You always find something in the last place you look.
Bore, n.: A guy who wraps up a two-minute idea in a two-hour vocabulary. -- Walter Winchell
Bore, n.: A person who talks when you wish him to listen. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Boren's Laws: (1) When in charge, ponder. (2) When in trouble, delegate. (3) When in doubt, mumble.
Boston, n.: Ludwig van Beethoven being jeered by 50,000 sports fans for finishing second in the Irish jig competition.
"Boy, life takes a long time to live -- Steven Wright
Boy, n.: A noise with dirt on it.
Boys are beyond the range of anybody's sure understanding, at least when they are between the ages of 18 months and 90 years. -- James Thurber
Boys will be boys, and so will a lot of middle-aged men. -- Kin Hubbard
Bradley's Bromide: If computers get too powerful, we can organize them into a committee -- that will do them in.
Brain fried -- Core dumped
Brain, n.: The apparatus with which we think that we think. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Bride, n.: A woman with a fine prospect of happiness behind her. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Bringing computers into the home won't change either one, but may revitalize the corner saloon.
Broad-mindedness, n.: The result of flattening high-mindedness out.
Brook's Law: Adding manpower to a late software project makes it later
Bubble Memory, n.: A derogatory term, usually referring to a person's intelligence. See also "vacuum tube".
Bucy's Law: Nothing is ever accomplished by a reasonable man.
Bugs, pl. n.: Small living things that small living boys throw on small living girls.
Bumper sticker:  "All the parts falling off this car are of the very finest British manufacture"
Bureaucrat, n.: A person who cuts red tape sideways. -- J. McCabe
Bureaucrat, n.: A politician who has tenure.
Bureaucrats cut red tape -- lengthwise.
"But don't you worry, its for a cause -- feeding global corporations paws."
"But I don't like Spam!!!!"
"But officer, I was only trying to gain enough speed so I could coast to the nearest gas station."
But scientists, who ought to know Assure us that it must be so. Oh, let us never, never doubt What nobody is sure about. -- Hilaire Belloc
But soft you, the fair Ophelia: Ope not thy ponderous and marble jaws, But get thee to a nunnery -- go! -- Mark "The Bard" Twain
... But we've only fondled the surface of that subject. -- Virginia Masters
"But what we need to know is, do people want nasally-insertable computers?"
By doing just a little every day, you can gradually let the task completely overwhelm you.
"By the time they had diminished from 50 to 8, the other dwarves began to suspect 'Hungry' ..." -- Gary Larson, "The Far Side"
By trying, we can easily learn to endure adversity -- another man's, I mean. -- Mark Twain
Cabbage, n.: A familiar kitchen-garden vegetable about as large and wise as a man's head. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
"Cable is not a luxury, since many areas have poor TV reception." -- The mayor of Tucson, Arizona, 1989
Cahn's Axiom: When all else fails, read the instructions.
California is a fine place to live -- if you happen to be an orange. -- Fred Allen
Call on God, but row away from the rocks. -- Indian proverb
"Calling J-Man Kink. Calling J-Man Kink. Hash missile sighted, target Los Angeles. Disregard personal feelings about city and intercept."
"Calvin Coolidge looks as if he had been weaned on a pickle." -- Alice Roosevelt Longworth
"Calvin Coolidge was the greatest man who ever came out of Plymouth Corner, Vermont." -- Clarence Darrow
Campus sidewalks never exist as the straightest line between two points. -- M. M. Johnston
Canada Bill Jone's Motto: It's morally wrong to allow suckers to keep their money.  Supplement: A .44 magnum beats four aces.
Captain Penny's Law: You can fool all of the people some of the time, and some of the people all of the time, but you Can't Fool Mom.
Carmel, New York, has an ordinance forbidding men to wear coats and trousers that don't match.
Cat, n.: Lapwarmer with built-in buzzer.
Cauliflower is nothing but Cabbage with a College Education. -- Mark Twain
Caution: breathing may be hazardous to your health.
CChheecckk yyoouurr dduupplleexx sswwiittcchh..
Celebrate Hannibal Day this year. Take an elephant to lunch.
Census Taker to Housewife: Did you ever have the measles, and, if so, how many?
Certainly there are things in life that money can't buy, but it's very funny-- Did you ever try buying them without money? -- Ogden Nash
Character Density, n.: The number of very weird people in the office.
Checkuary, n.: The thirteenth month of the year. Begins New Year's Day and ends when a person stops absentmindedly writing the old year on his checks.
Chef, n.: Any cook who swears in French.
Chemicals, n.: Noxious substances from which modern foods are made.
Chemistry is applied theology. -- Augustus Stanley Owsley III
Chicago law prohibits eating in a place that is on fire.
Chicago, n.: Where the dead still vote ... early and often!
Chicken Little only has to be right once.
Chicken Little was right.
Children are natural mimic who act like their parents despite every effort to teach them good manners.
Children are unpredictable. You never know what inconsistency they're going to catch you in next. -- Franklin P. Jones
Children aren't happy without something to ignore, And that's what parents were created for. -- Ogden Nash
Children seldom misquote you. In fact, they usually repeat word for word what you shouldn't have said.
Chism's Law of Completion: The amount of time required to complete a government project is precisely equal to the length of time already spent on it.
Chisolm's First Corollary to Murphy's Second Law: When things just can't possibly get any worse, they will.
Christ: A man who was born at least 5,000 years ahead of his time.
Churchill's Commentary on Man: Man will occasionally stumble over the truth, but most of the time he will pick himself up and continue on.
Cigarette, n.: A fire at one end, a fool at the other, and a bit of tobacco in between.
Cinemuck, n.: The combination of popcorn, soda, and melted chocolate which covers the floors of movie theaters. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Cleaning your house while your kids are still growing is like shoveling the walk before it stops snowing. -- Phyllis Diller
Cleanliness is next to impossible.
Cleveland still lives. God ____must be dead.
"Cleveland? Yes, I spent a week there one day."
Cloning is the sincerest form of flattery.
Clothes make the man. Naked people have little or no influence on society. -- Mark Twain
COBOL programs are an exercise in Artificial Inelegance.
Cocaine -- the thinking man's Dristan.
Cogito cogito ergo cogito sum -- "I think that I think, therefore I think that I am." -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
"Cogito ergo I'm right and you're wrong." -- Blair Houghton
Coincidence, n.: You weren't paying attention to the other half of what was going on.
Coincidences are spiritual puns. -- G. K. Chesterton
Cold, adj.: When the local flashers are handing out written descriptions.
Cold, adj.: When the politicians walk around with their hands in their own pockets.
Collaboration, n.: A literary partnership based on the false assumption that the other fellow can spell.
Colvard's Logical Premises:
won't.  Colvard's Unconscionable Commentary: This is especially true when dealing with someone you're attracted to.  Grelb's Commentary
Command, n.: Statement presented by a human and accepted by a computer in such a manner as to make the human feel as if he is in control.
Commitment, n.: Commitment can be illustrated by a breakfast of ham and eggs. The chicken was involved, the pig was committed.
Committee, n.: A group of men who individually can do nothing but as a group decide that nothing can be done. -- Fred Allen
Committees have become so important nowadays that subcommittees have to be appointed to do the work.
Common sense and a sense of humor are the same thing, moving at different speeds. A sense of humor is just common sense, dancing. -- Clive James
Common sense is instinct, and enough of it is genius. -- Josh Billings
Common sense is the collection of prejudices acquired by age eighteen. -- Albert Einstein
Computer programmers do it byte by byte
Computer Science is merely the post-Turing decline in formal systems theory.
Computers are not intelligent. They only think they are.
Computers are useless. They can only give you answers. -- Pablo Picasso
Computers can figure out all kinds of problems, except the things in the world that just don't add up.
Computers will not be perfected until they can compute how much more than the estimate the job will cost.
Conceit causes more conversation than wit. -- LaRouchefoucauld
Concept, n.: Any "idea" for which an outside consultant billed you more than $25,000.
... [concerning quotation marks] even if we *___did* quote anybody in this business, it probably would be gibberish. -- Thom McLeod
Condense soup, not books!
Confession is good for the soul only in the sense that a tweed coat is good for dandruff. -- Peter de Vries
Confidence is the feeling you have before you understand the situation.
Conscience is a mother-in-law whose visit never ends. -- H. L. Mencken
Conscience is the inner voice that warns us somebody is looking -- H. L. Mencken
Conscience is what hurts when everything else feels so good.
Conscious is when you are aware of something and conscience is when you wish you weren't.
"Consequences, Schmonsequences, as long as I'm rich." -- "Ali Baba Bunny" [1957, Chuck Jones]
Consultants are mystical people who ask a company for a number and then give it back to them.
"Contrary to popular belief, penguins are not the salvation of modern technology. Neither do they throw parties for the urban proletariat."
Conversation, n.: A vocal competition in which the one who is catching his breath is called the listener.
Conway's Law: In any organization there will always be one person who knows what is going on.  This person must be fired.
Corrupt, adj.: In politics, holding an office of trust or profit.
Corruption is not the #1 priority of the Police Commissioner. His job is to enforce the law and fight crime. -- P.B.A. President E. J. Kiernan
Court, n.: A place where they dispense with justice. -- Arthur Train
Coward, n.: One who in a perilous emergency thinks with his legs. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Crash programs fail because they are based on the theory that, with nine women pregnant, you can get a baby a month. -- Wernher von Braun
Crime does not pay ... as well as politics. -- A. E. Newman
Critic, n.: A person who boasts himself hard to please because nobody tries to please him. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Croll's Query: If tin whistles are made of tin, what are foghorns made of?
cursor address, n: "Hello, cursor!" -- Stan Kelly-Bootle, "The Devil's DP Dictionary"
Cynic, n.: One who looks through rose-colored glasses with a jaundiced eye.
Dare to be naive. -- R. Buckminster Fuller
Darth Vader sleeps with a Teddywookie.
Dave Mack: "Your stupidity, Allen, is simply not up to par." Allen Gwinn: "Yours is."
Dawn, n.: The time when men of reason go to bed. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Day of inquiry. You will be subpoenaed.
VMS-F-PDGERS, pudding between the ears
Dealing with failure is easy: work hard to improve. Success is also easy to handle: you've solved the wrong problem. Work hard to improve.
Dear Lord: I just want *___one* one-armed manager so I never have to hear "On the other hand", again.
Death is God's way of telling you not to be such a wise guy.
Death is life's way of telling you you've been fired. -- R. Geis
Death is Nature's way of recycling human beings.
"Death is nature's way of saying `Howdy'".
Death is nature's way of telling you to slow down
Death is only a state of mind.  Only it doesn't leave you much time to think about anything else.
Death to all fanatics!
Decision maker, n.: The person in your office who was unable to form a task force before the music stopped.
Deliberation, n.: The act of examining one's bread to determine which side it is buttered on. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
"Deliver yesterday, code today, think tomorrow."
Demand the establishment of the government in its rightful home at Disneyland.
Democracy is a device that insures we shall be governed no better than we deserve. -- George Bernard Shaw
Democracy is a form of government in which it is permitted to wonder aloud what the country could do under first-class management. -- Senator Soaper
Democracy is a form of government that substitutes election by the incompetent many for appointment by the corrupt few. -- G. B. Shaw
Democracy is a government where you can say what you think even if you don't think.
Democracy is also a form of worship. It is the worship of Jackals by Jackasses. -- H. L. Mencken
Democracy is good. I say this because other systems are worse. -- Jawaharlal Nehru
Democracy is the recurrent suspicion that more than half of the people are right more than half of the time. -- E. B. White
Demographic polls show that you have lost credibility across the board. Especially with those 14 year-old Valley girls.
Dentist, n.: A Prestidigitator who, putting metal in one's mouth, pulls coins out of one's pockets. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
DeVries's Dilemma: If you hit two keys on the typewriter, the one you don't want hits the paper.
Did I say 2? I lied.
Did you know ...  That no-one ever reads these things?
Did you know that clones never use mirrors? -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Did you know that if you took all the economists in the world and lined them up end to end, they'd still point in the wrong direction?
Die, v.: To stop sinning suddenly. -- Elbert Hubbard
"Die? I should say not, dear fellow. No Barrymore would allow such a conventional thing to happen to him." -- John Barrymore's dying words
Different all twisty a of in maze are you, passages little.
Dimensions will always be expressed in the least usable term. Velocity, for example, will be expressed in furlongs per fortnight.
Diplomacy is the art of saying "nice doggy" until you can find a rock.
Disc space -- the final frontier!
Disclaimer: "These opinions are my own, though for a small fee they be yours too." -- Dave Haynie
Disco is to music what Etch-A-Sketch is to art.
Distinctive, adj.: A different color or shape than our competitors.
Distress, n.: A disease incurred by exposure to the prosperity of a friend. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Do infants have as much fun in infancy as adults do in adultery?
Do molecular biologists wear designer genes?
Do not believe in miracles -- rely on them.
Do not drink coffee in early a.m. It will keep you awake until noon.
Do not meddle in the affairs of troff, for it is subtle and quick to anger.
"Do not meddle in the affairs of wizards, for you are crunchy and good with ketchup."
Do not read this fortune under penalty of law. Violators will be prosecuted. (Penal Code sec. 2.3.2 (II.a.))
Do not sleep in a eucalyptus tree tonight.
Do not try to solve all life's problems at once -- learn to dread each day as it comes. -- Donald Kaul
Do something unusual today. Pay a bill.
Do what comes naturally now. Seethe and fume and throw a tantrum.
Do you have lysdexia?
Do you realize how many holes there could be if people would just take the time to take the dirt out of them?
Documentation is like sex: when it is good, it is very, very good; and when it is bad, it is better than nothing. -- Dick Brandon
Documentation is the castor oil of programming. Managers know it must be good because the programmers hate it so much.
Does the name Pavlov ring a bell?
Don't abandon hope: your Tom Mix decoder ring arrives tomorrow.
Don't be humble ... you're not that great. -- Golda Meir
Don't believe everything you hear or anything you say.
Don't change the reason, just change the excuses! -- Joe Cointment
Don't cook tonight -- starve a rat today!
Don't feed the bats tonight.
Don't get even -- get odd!
Don't get suckered in by the comments -- they can be terribly misleading. Debug only code. -- Dave Storer
"Don't go around saying the world owes you a living. The world owes you nothing. It was here first." -- Mark Twain
Don't go surfing in South Dakota for a while.
Don't hate yourself in the morning -- sleep till noon.
Don't hit a man when he's down -- kick him; it's easier.
Don't kiss an elephant on the lips today.
Don't knock President Fillmore. He kept us out of Vietnam.
Don't let people drive you crazy when you know it's in walking distance.
Don't let your mind wander -- it's too little to be let out alone.
Don't look back, the lemmings are gaining on you.
Don't put off for tomorrow what you can do today, because if you enjoy it today you can do it again tomorrow.
"Don't say yes until I finish talking." -- Darryl F. Zanuck
Don't steal; thou'lt never thus compete successfully in business. Cheat. -- Ambrose Bierce
Don't suspect your friends -- turn them in! -- "Brazil"
Don't take life so serious, son, it ain't nohow permanent. -- Walt Kelly
Don't take life too seriously -- you'll never get out of it alive.
Don't tell any big lies today. Small ones can be just as effective.
"Don't tell me I'm burning the candle at both ends -- tell me where to get more wax!!"
Don't worry about avoiding temptation -- as you grow older, it starts avoiding you. -- The Old Farmer's Almanac
"Don't worry about people stealing your ideas. If your ideas are any good, you'll have to ram them down people's throats." -- Howard Aiken
Don't worry about the world coming to an end today. It's already tomorrow in Australia. -- Charles Schultz
Don't worry over what other people are thinking about you. They're too busy worrying over what you are thinking about them.
Don't you feel more like you do now than you did when you came in?
Down with categorical imperative!
"Drawing on my fine command of language, I said nothing."
Drew's Law of Highway Biology: The first bug to hit a clean windshield lands directly in front of your eyes.
Drink Canada Dry! You might not succeed, but it *__is* fun trying.
Drive defensively. Buy a tank.
Drugs may be the road to nowhere, but at least they're the scenic route!
Ducharme's Axiom: If you view your problem closely enough you will recognize yourself as part of the problem.
Ducharme's Precept: Opportunity always knocks at the least opportune moment.
Duct tape is like the force. It has a light side, and a dark side, and it holds the universe together ... -- Carl Zwanzig
Due to a shortage of devoted followers, the production of great leaders has been discontinued.
Due to circumstances beyond your control, you are master of your fate and captain of your soul.
Due to lack of disk space, this fortune database has been discontinued.
"Dying is a very dull, dreary affair. And my advice to you is to have nothing whatever to do with it." -- W. Somerset Maugham
E Pluribus Unix
Earn cash in your spare time -- blackmail your friends
Earth is a beta site.
"Earth is a great, big funhouse without the fun." -- Jeff Berner
Eat drink and be merry, for tomorrow they may make it illegal.
"Eat, drink, and be merry, for tomorrow you may work."
Economics is extremely useful as a form of employment for economists. -- John Kenneth Galbraith
Economics, n.: Economics is the study of the value and meaning of J. K. Galbraith ... -- Mike Harding, "The Armchair Anarchist's Almanac"
Economists state their GNP growth projections to the nearest tenth of a percentage point to prove they have a sense of humor. -- Edgar R. Fiedler
Ed Sullivan will be around as long as someone else has talent. -- Fred Allen
Education is the process of casting false pearls before real swine. -- Irsin Edman
Eeny, Meeny, Jelly Beanie, the spirits are about to speak! -- Bullwinkle Moose
Eggheads unite! You have nothing to lose but your yolks. -- Adlai Stevenson
Egotism is the anesthetic given by a kindly nature to relieve the pain of being a damned fool. -- Bellamy Brooks
Egotist, n.: A person of low taste, more interested in himself than me. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Ehrman's Commentary: (1) Things will get worse before they get better. (2) Who said things would get better?
Eighty percent of air pollution comes from plants and trees. -- Ronald Reagan, famous movie star
Electrical Engineers do it with less resistance.
Electrocution, n.: Burning at the stake with all the modern improvements.
Elevators smell different to midgets
Emerson's Law of Contrariness: Our chief want in life is somebody who shall make us do what we can. Having found them, we shall then hate them for it.
Endless Loop: n., see Loop, Endless. Loop, Endless: n., see Endless Loop. -- Random Shack Data Processing Dictionary
Entropy isn't what it used to be.
Enzymes are things invented by biologists that explain things which otherwise require harder thinking. -- Jerome Lettvin
Epperson's law: When a man says it's a silly, childish game, it's probably something his wife can beat him at.
Equal bytes for women.
Error in operator: add beer
Eternal nothingness is fine if you happen to be dressed for it. -- Woody Allen
Even if you do learn to speak correct English, whom are you going to speak it to? -- Clarence Darrow
"Even if you're on the right track, you'll get run over if you just sit there." -- Will Rogers
"Even the best of friends cannot attend each other's funeral." -- Kehlog Albran, "The Profit"
Even though they raised the rate for first class mail in the United States we really shouldn't complain -- it's still only two cents a day.
Ever notice that even the busiest people are never too busy to tell you just how busy they are.
Every absurdity has a champion who will defend it.
Every creature has within him the wild, uncontrollable urge to punt.
Every four seconds a woman has a baby. Our problem is to find this woman and stop her.
Every improvement in communication makes the bore more terrible. -- Frank Moore Colby
Every journalist has a novel in him, which is an excellent place for it.
Every little picofarad has a nanohenry all its own. -- Don Vonada
"Every man has his price. Mine is $3.95."
Every man is as God made him, ay, and often worse. -- Miguel de Cervantes
"Every morning, I get up and look through the 'Forbes' list of the richest people in America. If I'm not there, I go to work" -- Robert Orben
Every nonzero finite dimensional inner product space has an orthonormal basis.  It makes sense, when you don't think about it.
Every program has two purposes -- one for which it was written and another for which it wasn't.
Every program is a part of some other program, and rarely fits.
Every solution breeds new problems.
Every successful person has had failures but repeated failure is no guarantee of eventual success.
"Every time I think I know where it's at, they move it."
Every word is like an unnecessary stain on silence and nothingness. -- Beckett
Everybody is somebody else's weirdo. -- Dykstra
Everybody wants to go to heaven, but nobody wants to die.
Everyone can be taught to sculpt: Michelangelo would have had to be taught how ___not to. So it is with the great programmers.
Everyone is a genius. It's just that some people are too stupid to realize it.
Everyone talks about apathy, but no one ____does anything about it.
Everything is controlled by a small evil group to which, unfortunately, no one we know belongs.
Everything is worth precisely as much as a belch, the difference being that a belch is more satisfying. -- Ingmar Bergman
Everything should be built top-down, except the first time.
Everything you know is wrong!
Excellent day for drinking heavily. Spike office water cooler.
Excellent day for putting Slinkies on an escalator.
Excellent day to have a rotten day.
Excellent time to become a missing person.
Excess on occasion is exhilarating. It prevents moderation from acquiring the deadening effect of a habit. -- W. Somerset Maugham
Excessive login or logout messages are a sure sign of senility.
Executive ability is deciding quickly and getting somebody else to do the work. -- John G. Pollard
Expect the worst, it's the least you can do.
Expense Accounts, n.: Corporate food stamps.
Experience is something you don't get until just after you need it. -- Olivier
Experience is that marvelous thing that enables you recognize a mistake when you make it again. -- F. P. Jones
Experience is the worst teacher. It always gives the test first and the instruction afterward.
Experience is what causes a person to make new mistakes instead of old ones.
Experience is what you get when you were expecting something else.
Experience varies directly with equipment ruined.
Expert, n.: Someone who comes from out of town and shows slides.
F u cn rd ths u cnt spl wrth a dm!
f u cn rd ths, itn tyg h myxbl cd.
f u cn rd ths, u cn gt a gd jb n cmptr prgrmmng.
F: When into a room I plunge, I Sometimes find some VIOLET FUNGI. Then I linger, darkly brooding On the poison they're exuding. -- The Roguelet's ABC
Facts are stubborn, but statistics are more pliable.
Fairy Tale, n.: A horror story to prepare children for the newspapers.
Faith is the quality that enables you to eat blackberry jam on a picnic without looking to see whether the seeds move.
Faith, n: That quality which enables us to believe what we know to be untrue.
Familiarity breeds attempt
Famous last words:
Famous, adj.: Conspicuously miserable. -- Ambrose Bierce
Fashion is a form of ugliness so intolerable that we have to alter it every six months. -- Oscar Wilde
Fats Loves Madelyn
Feel disillusioned? I've got some great new illusions ...
Fertility is hereditary. If your parents didn't have any children, neither will you.
Fifth Law of Procrastination: Procrastination avoids boredom; one never has the feeling that there is nothing important to do.
Fifty flippant frogs Walked by on flippered feet And with their slime they made the time Unnaturally fleet.
Fights between cats and dogs are prohibited by statute in Barber, North Carolina.
Finagle's Creed: Science is true. Don't be misled by facts.
Finagle's First Law: If an experiment works, something has gone wrong.
Finagle's fourth Law: Once a job is fouled up, anything done to improve it only makes it worse.
Finding out what goes on in the C.I.A. is like performing acupuncture on a rock. -- New York Times, Jan. 20, 1981
Fine day to throw a party. Throw him as far as you can.
Fine day to work off excess energy. Steal something heavy.
Fine's Corollary: Functionality breeds Contempt.
First Corollary of Taber's Second Law: Machines that piss people off get murdered. -- Pat Taber
First Law of Bicycling: No matter which way you ride, it's uphill and against the wind.
First Law of Socio-Genetics: Celibacy is not hereditary.
First Rule of History: History doesn't repeat itself -- historians merely repeat each other.
"First things first -- but not necessarily in that order" -- The Doctor, "Doctor Who"
Five is a sufficiently close approximation to infinity. -- Robert Firth
Flappity, floppity, flip The mouse on the m"obius strip; The strip revolved, The mouse dissolved In a chronodimensional skip.
FLASH! Intelligence of mankind decreasing. Details at ... uh, when the little hand is on the ....
Flon's Law: There is not now, and never will be, a language in which it is the least bit difficult to write bad programs.
Flugg's Law: When you need to knock on wood is when you realize that the world is composed of vinyl, naugahyde and aluminum.
Flying saucers on occasion Show themselves to human eyes. Aliens fume, put off invasion While they brand these tales as lies.
Food for thought is no substitute for the real thing. -- Walt Kelly, "Putluck Pogo"
For 20 dollars, I'll give you a good fortune next time ...
For a good time, call (415) 642-9483
For a man to truly understand rejection, he must first be ignored by a cat.
"For an adequate time call 555-3321"
For an idea to be fashionable is ominous, since it must afterwards be always old-fashioned.
For every complex problem, there is a solution that is simple, neat, and wrong. -- H. L. Mencken
For every credibility gap, there is a gullibility fill. -- R. Clopton
"For I perceive that behind this seemingly unrelated sequence of events, there lurks a singular, sinister attitude of mind."  "Whose?"  "MINE! HA-HA!"
For large values of one, one equals two, for small values of two.
For perfect happiness, remember two things: (1) Be content with what you've got. (2) Be sure you've got plenty.
For some reason, this fortune reminds everyone of Marvin Zelkowitz.
For those who like this sort of thing, this is the sort of thing they like. -- Abraham Lincoln
"For three days after death hair and fingernails continue to grow but phone calls taper off." -- Johnny Carson
For your penance, say five Hail Marys and one loud BLAH!
Forgetfulness, n.: A gift of God bestowed upon debtors in compensation for their destitution of conscience.
Forms follow function, and often obliterate it.
Fortune's Fictitious Country Song Title of the Week: "How Can I Miss You if You Won't Go Away?"
Fortune's graffito of the week (or maybe even month):  Don't Write On Walls!  (and underneath)  You want I should type?
Fortune's Office Door Sign of the Week:  Incorrigible punster -- Do not incorrige.
Fortune's Real-Life Courtroom Quote #52:  Q: What is your name? A: Ernestine McDowell. Q: And what is your marital status? A: Fair.
fortune: cpu time/usefulness ratio too high -- core dumped.
Fourth Law of Revision: It is usually impractical to worry beforehand about interferences -- if you have none, someone will make one for you.
Fourth Law of Thermodynamics: If the probability of success is not almost one, it is damn near zero. -- David Ellis
Frankfort, Kentucky, makes it against the law to shoot off a policeman's tie.
Fresco's Discovery: If you knew what you were doing you'd probably be bored.
Frisbeetarianism, n.: The belief that when you die, your soul goes up the on roof and gets stuck.
Fuch's Warning: If you actually look like your passport photo, you aren't well enough to travel.
Fudd's First Law of Opposition: Push something hard enough and it will fall over.
Furbling, v.: Having to wander through a maze of ropes at an airport or bank even when you are the only person in line. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Furious activity is no substitute for understanding. -- H. H. Williams
Future looks spotty. You will spill soup in late evening.
Garbage In -- Gospel Out.
"Gee, Toto, I don't think we are in Kansas anymore."
Genetics explains why you look like your father, and if you don't, why you should.
Genius may have its limitations, but stupidity is not thus handicapped. -- Elbert Hubbard
Genius, n.: A chemist who discovers a laundry additive that rhymes with "bright".
George Orwell 1984. Northwestern 0. -- Chicago Reader 10/15/82
George Orwell was an optimist.
George Washington was first in war, first in peace -- and the first to have his birthday juggled to make a long weekend. -- Ashley Cooper
Get forgiveness now -- tomorrow you may no longer feel guilty.
Get Revenge! Live long enough to be a problem for your children!
Give me a Plumber's friend the size of the Pittsburgh dome, and a place to stand, and I will drain the world.
"Give me enough medals, and I'll win any war." -- Napolean
Give me the Luxuries, and the Hell with the Necessities!
Give thought to your reputation. Consider changing name and moving to a new town.
Give your child mental blocks for Christmas.
"Given the choice between accomplishing something and just lying around, I'd rather lie around. No contest." -- Eric Clapton
Gnagloot, n.: A person who leaves all his ski passes on his jacket just to impress people. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Go 'way! You're bothering me!
Go climb a gravity well!
Go placidly amid the noise and waste, and remember what value there may be in owning a piece thereof. -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
//GO.SYSIN DD *, DOODAH, DOODAH
God did not create the world in seven days; he screwed around for six days and then pulled an all-nighter.
God doesn't play dice. -- Albert Einstein
God is a comic playing to an audience that's afraid to laugh.
God is a polytheist.
God is Dead -- Nietzsche Nietzsche is Dead -- God Nietzsche is God -- The Dead
God is not dead! He's alive and autographing bibles at Cody's
God is real, unless declared integer.
God is the tangential point between zero and infinity. -- Alfred Jarry
God isn't dead, he just couldn't find a parking place.
God made machine language; all the rest is the work of man.
God made the Idiot for practice, and then He made the School Board -- Mark Twain
God made the integers; all else is the work of Man. -- Kronecker
God made the world in six days, and was arrested on the seventh.
God may be subtle, but He isn't plain mean. -- Albert Einstein
God must love the Common Man; He made so many of them.
Goldenstern's Rules: (1) Always hire a rich attorney (2) Never buy from a rich salesman.
Good advice is something a man gives when he is too old to set a bad example. -- La Rouchefoucauld
Good day for a change of scene. Repaper the bedroom wall.
Good day for overcoming obstacles. Try a steeplechase.
Good day to avoid cops. Crawl to school.
Good day to let down old friends who need help.
Good leaders being scarce, following yourself is allowed.
Good news is just life's way of keeping you off balance.
Good news. Ten weeks from Friday will be a pretty good day.
Good night to spend with family, but avoid arguments with your mate's new lover.
"Good-bye. I am leaving because I am bored." -- George Saunders' dying words
Gordon's first law: If a research project is not worth doing, it is not worth doing well.
"Gosh that takes me back ... or forward. That's the trouble with time travel, you never can tell." -- Dr. Who
Gosh that takes me back... or is it forward? That's the trouble with time travel, you never can tell." -- Doctor Who "Androids of Tara"
Got Mole problems? Call Avogardo 6.02 x 10^23
Goto, n.: A programming tool that exists to allow structured programmers to complain about unstructured programmers. -- Ray Simard
Government [is] an illusion the governed should not encourage. -- John Updike, "Couples"
Government lies, and newspapers lie, but in a democracy they are different lies.
Grabel's Law: 2 is not equal to 3 -- not even for large values of 2.
Graduate life -- it's not just a job, it's an indenture.
Graduate life: It's not just a job. It's an indenture.
Grandpa Charnock's Law: You never really learn to swear until you learn to drive.
Gravity is a myth, the Earth sucks.
Great minds run in great circles.
Green light in a.m. for new projects. Red light in P.M. for traffic tickets.
Greener's Law: Never argue with a man who buys ink by the barrel.
Grelb's Reminder: Eighty percent of all people consider themselves to be above average drivers.
"Grub first, then ethics." -- Bertolt Brecht
H. L. Mencken suffers from the hallucination that he is H. L. Mencken -- there is no cure for a disease of that magnitude. -- Maxwell Bodenheim
H. L. Mencken's Law: Those who can -- do. Those who can't -- teach.  Martin's Extension: Those who cannot teach -- administrate.
Hacker's Law: The belief that enhanced understanding will necessarily stir a nation to action is one of mankind's oldest illusions.
Hacking's just another word for nothing left to kludge.
... Had this been an actual emergency, we would have fled in terror, and you would not have been informed.
Hail to the sun god He sure is a fun god Ra! Ra! Ra!
Hain't we got all the fools in town on our side? And hain't that a big enough majority in any town? -- Mark Twain, "Huckleberry Finn"
Half Moon tonight. (At least it's better than no Moon at all.)
Hand, n.: A singular instrument worn at the end of a human arm and commonly thrust into somebody's pocket. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Hanlon's Razor: Never attribute to malice that which is adequately explained by stupidity.
Hanson's Treatment of Time: There are never enough hours in a day, but always too many days before Saturday.
Happiness is having a scratch for every itch. -- Ogden Nash
Happiness isn't something you experience; it's something you remember. -- Oscar Levant
Happiness, n.: An agreeable sensation arising from contemplating the misery of another. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Hard work may not kill you, but why take chances?
Hardware, n.: The parts of a computer system that can be kicked.
Hark ye, Clinker, you are a most notorious offender. You stand convicted of sickness, hunger, wretchedness, and want. -- Tobias Smollet
Hark, Hark, the dogs do bark The Duke is fond of kittens He likes to take their insides out And use them for his mittens From "The Thirteen Clocks"
Hark, the Herald Tribune sings, Advertising wondrous things. -- Tom Lehrer
Harris's Lament: All the good ones are taken.
Harrisberger's Fourth Law of the Lab: Experience is directly proportional to the amount of equipment ruined.
Hartley's First Law: You can lead a horse to water, but if you can get him to float on his back, you've got something.
Hartley's Second Law: Never sleep with anyone crazier than yourself.
Hatred, n.: A sentiment appropriate to the occasion of another's superiority. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Have an adequate day.
Have an adequate day.
Have you ever noticed that the people who are always trying to tell you, "There's a time for work and a time for play," never find the time for play?
"Have you lived here all your life?" "Oh, twice that long."
Have you noticed that all you need to grow healthy, vigorous grass is a crack in your sidewalk?
Have you noticed the way people's intelligence capabilities decline sharply the minute they start waving guns around? -- Dr. Who
Have you reconsidered a computer career?
"He flung himself on his horse and rode madly off in all directions"
He had occasional flashes of silence that made his conversation perfectly delightful. -- Sydney Smith
He hadn't a single redeeming vice. -- Oscar Wilde
"He is now rising from affluence to poverty." -- Mark Twain
He looked at me as if I was a side dish he hadn't ordered.
He played the king as if afraid someone else would play the ace. -- John Mason Brown, drama critic
He was a fiddler, and consequently a rogue. -- Jonathon Swift
"He was a modest, good-humored boy. It was Oxford that made him insufferable."
"He was so narrow minded he could see through a keyhole with both eyes ..."
He who attacks the fundamentals of the American broadcasting industry attacks democracy itself. -- William S. Paley, chairman of CBS
He who Laughs, Lasts.
"He's just a politician trying to save both his faces ..."
He's the kind of guy, that, well, if you were ever in a jam he'd be there ... with two slices of bread and some chunky peanut butter.
"He's the kind of man for the times that need the kind of man he is ..."
HE: Let's end it all, bequeathin' our brains to science. SHE: What?!? Science got enough trouble with their ___OWN brains. -- Walt Kelley
Health is merely the slowest possible rate at which one can die.
Health nuts are going to feel stupid someday, lying in hospitals dying of nothing. -- Redd Foxx
Health nuts are going to feel stupid someday, lying in hospitals dying of nothing. -- Redd Foxx
Heavy, adj.: Seduced by the chocolate side of the force.
"Heisenberg may have slept here"
Hell hath no fury like a bureaucrat scorned. -- Milton Friedman
"Hello," he lied. -- Don Carpenter quoting a Hollywood agent
Help a swallow land at Capistrano.
Help fight continental drift.
Help me, I'm a prisoner in a Fortune cookie file!
Help stamp out and abolish redundancy.
Help! I'm trapped in a PDP 11/70!
HELP! MY TYPEWRITER IS BROKEN! -- E. E. CUMMINGS
"Here at the Phone Company, we serve all kinds of people; from Presidents and Kings to the scum of the earth ..."
"Here's something to think about: How come you never see a headline like `Psychic Wins Lottery'?" -- Jay Leno
Heuristics are bug ridden by definition. If they didn't have bugs, then they'd be algorithms.
"Hey! Who took the cork off my lunch??!" -- W. C. Fields
Hindsight is an exact science.
Hire the morally handicapped.
"His great aim was to escape from civilization, and, as soon as he had money, he went to Southern California."
"His mind is like a steel trap -- full of mice" -- Foghorn Leghorn
"His super power is to turn into a scotch terrier."
History is curious stuff You'd think by now we had enough Yet the fact remains I fear They make more of it every year.
History repeats itself. That's one thing wrong with history.
Hlade's Law: If you have a difficult task, give it to a lazy person -- they will find an easier way to do it.
Hoare's Law of Large Problems: Inside every large problem is a small problem struggling to get out.
Hofstadter's Law: It always takes longer than you expect, even when you take Hofstadter's Law into account.
Hollywood is where if you don't have happiness you send out for it. -- Rex Reed
Home of Doberman Propulsion Laboratories: The ultimate in watchdog weaponry. -- Chris Shaw
"Honesty is the best policy, but insanity is a better defense"
Honesty pays, but it doesn't seem to pay enough to suit some people. -- F. M. Hubbard
Honk if you hate bumper stickers that say "Honk if ..."
Honk if you love peace and quiet.
Horngren's Observation: Among economists, the real world is often a special case.
Horse sense is the thing a horse has which keeps it from betting on people. -- W. C. Fields
Horses are forbidden to eat fire hydrants in Marshalltown, Iowa.
"Houston, Tranquillity Base here. The Eagle has landed." -- Neil Armstrong
How can you be in two places at once when you're not anywhere at all?
How come only your friends step on your new white sneakers?
How come wrong numbers are never busy?
"How do I love thee? My accumulator overflows."
How do you explain school to a higher intelligence? -- Elliot, "E.T."
How long a minute is depends on which side of the bathroom door you're on.
How much does it cost to entice a dope-smoking UNIX system guru to Dayton? -- Brian Boyle, UNIX/WORLD's First Annual Salary Survey
How wonderful opera would be if there were no singers.
How wonderful opera would be if there were no singers.
HOW YOU CAN TELL THAT IT'S GOING TO BE A ROTTEN DAY: #1040 Your income tax refund cheque bounces.
HOW YOU CAN TELL THAT IT'S GOING TO BE A ROTTEN DAY: #15 Your pet rock snaps at you.
HOW YOU CAN TELL THAT IT'S GOING TO BE A ROTTEN DAY:  #32: You call your answering service and they've never heard of you.
Howe's Law: Everyone has a scheme that will not work.
However, never daunted, I will cope with adversity in my traditional manner ... sulking and nausea. -- Tom K. Ryan
Human beings were created by water to transport it uphill.
Hummingbirds never remember the words to songs.
"Humor is a drug which it's the fashion to abuse." -- William Gilbert
Hurewitz's Memory Principle: The chance of forgetting something is directly proportional to ..... to ........ uh ..............
I am more bored than you could ever possibly be. Go back to work.
"I am not an Economist. I am an honest man!" -- Paul McCracken
"I am not now, and never have been, a girlfriend of Henry Kissinger." -- Gloria Steinem
I am not now, nor have I ever been, a member of the demigodic party. -- Dennis Ritchie
"I am not sure what this is, but an `F' would only dignify it." -- English Professor
"I am ready to meet my Maker. Whether my Maker is prepared for the great ordeal of meeting me is another matter." -- Winston Churchill
I am so optimistic about beef prices that I've just leased a pot roast with an option to buy.
"I am the mother of all things, and all things should wear a sweater."
'I believe in getting into hot water; it keeps you clean." -- G. K. Chesterton
"I belong to no organized party. I am a Democrat." -- Will Rogers
"I bet the human brain is a kludge." -- Marvin Minsky
I brake for chezlogs!
I call them as I see them. If I can't see them, I make them up. -- Biff Barf
I can read your mind, and you should be ashamed of yourself.
"I can resist anything but temptation."
"I can't complain, but sometimes I still do." -- Joe Walsh
"I can't decide whether to commit suicide or go bowling." -- Florence Henderson
I can't understand it. I can't even understand the people who can understand it. -- Queen Juliana of the Netherlands.
I can't understand why a person will take a year or two to write a novel when he can easily buy one for a few dollars. -- Fred Allen
"I cannot and will not cut my conscience to fit this year's fashions." -- Lillian Hellman
I cannot conceive that anybody will require multiplications at the rate of 40,000 or even 4,000 per hour ... -- F. H. Wales (1936)
I could dance till the cows come home. On second thought, I'd rather dance with the cows till you come home. -- Groucho Marx
"I couldn't remember when I had been so disappointed. Except perhaps the time I found out that M&Ms really *do* melt in your hand ..." -- Peter Oakley
"I didn't know it was impossible when I did it."
I didn't like the play, but I saw it under adverse conditions. The curtain was up.
"I do not fear computers. I fear the lack of them." -- Isaac Asimov
"I do not know myself, and God forbid that I should." -- Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"I don't believe in astrology. But then I'm an Aquarius, and Aquarians don't believe in astrology." -- James R. F. Quirk
I don't believe there really IS a GAS SHORTAGE.. I think it's all just a BIG HOAX on the part of the plastic sign salesmen -- to sell more numbers!!
I don't care for the Sugar Smacks commercial. I don't like the idea of a frog jumping on my Breakfast. -- Lowell, Chicago Reader 10/15/82
"I don't care who does the electing as long as I get to do the nominating" -- Boss Tweed
"I don't have any solution but I certainly admire the problem." -- Ashleigh Brilliant
"I don't have to take this abuse from you -- I've got hundreds of people waiting to abuse me." -- Bill Murray, "Ghostbusters"
I don't know anything about music. In my line you don't have to. -- Elvis Presley
"I don't know anything about music. In my line you don't have to." -- Elvis Presley
"I don't like spinach, and I'm glad I don't, because if I liked it I'd eat it, and I just hate it." -- Clarence Darrow
"I don't mind going nowhere as long as it's an interesting path." -- Ronald Mabbitt
I don't mind what Congress does, as long as they don't do it in the streets and frighten the horses. -- Victor Hugo
"I don't object to sex before marriage, but two minutes before?!?"
"I don't think so," said Ren'e Descartes. Just then, he vanished.
"I don't think they could put him in a mental hospital. On the other hand, if he were already in, I don't think they'd let him out."
I doubt, therefore I might be.
"I drink to make other people interesting." -- George Jean Nathan
I fell asleep reading a dull book, and I dreamt that I was reading on, so I woke up from sheer boredom.
"I found out why my car was humming. It had forgotten the words."
"I gained nothing at all from Supreme Enlightenment, and for that very reason it is called Supreme Enlightenment." -- Gotama Buddha
I gave up Smoking, Drinking and Sex. It was the most *__________horrifying* 20 minutes of my life!
'I generally avoid temptation unless I can't resist it." -- Mae West
"I had to censor everything my sons watched ... even on the Mary Tyler Moore show I heard the word 'damn'!" -- Mary Lou Bax
"I had to hit him -- he was starting to make sense."
"I hate it when my foot falls asleep during the day cause that means it's going to be up all night." -- Steven Wright
"I hate quotations." -- Ralph Waldo Emerson
I have a simple philosophy:  Fill what's empty. Empty what's full. Scratch where it itches. -- A. R. Longworth
"I have a very firm grasp on reality! I can reach out and strangle it any time!"
I have discovered the art of deceiving diplomats. I tell them the truth and they never believe me. -- Camillo Di Cavour
I have great faith in fools -- self confidence my friends call it. -- Edgar Allan Poe
I have learned To spell hors d'oeuvres Which still grates on Some people's n'oeuvres. -- Warren Knox
"I have made mistakes but I have never made the mistake of claiming that I have never made one." -- James Gordon Bennett
"I have made this letter longer than usual because I lack the time to make it shorter." -- Blaise Pascal
I have more humility in my little finger than you have in your whole ____BODY! -- from "Cerebus" #82
"I have seen the future and it is just like the present, only longer." -- Kehlog Albran, "The Profit"
"I have the simplest tastes. I am always satisfied with the best." -- Oscar Wilde
"I have the world's largest collection of seashells. I keep it scattered around the beaches of the world ... Perhaps you've seen it. -- Steven Wright
"I have to convince you, or at least snow you ..." -- Prof. Romas Aleliunas, CS 435
I have yet to see any problem, however complicated, which, when looked at in the right way, did not become still more complicated. -- Poul Anderson
"I haven't lost my mind -- it's backed up on tape somewhere."
"I haven't lost my mind; I know exactly where I left it."
I just forgot my whole philosophy of life!!!
"I just need enough to tide me over until I need more." -- Bill Hoest
I know it all. I just can't remember it all at once.
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." -- Albert Einstein
"I know the answer! The answer lies within the heart of all mankind! The answer is twelve? I think I'm in the wrong building." -- Charles Schulz
"I like being single. I'm always there when I need me." -- Art Leo
"I like work ... I can sit and watch it for hours."
"I like your game but we have to change the rules."
"I love to eat them Smurfies Smurfies what I love to eat Bite they ugly heads off, Nibble on they bluish feet."
"I may not be totally perfect, but parts of me are excellent." -- Ashleigh Brilliant
"I must have a prodigious quantity of mind; it takes me as much as a week sometimes to make it up." -- Mark Twain, "The Innocents Abroad"
I must have slipped a disk -- my pack hurts
"I never fail to convince an audience that the best thing they could do was to go away."
"I never met a piece of chocolate I didn't like."
I often quote myself; it adds spice to my conversation. -- G. B. Shaw
"I only touch base with reality on an as-needed basis!" -- Royal Floyd Mengot (Klaus)
I predict that today will be remembered until tomorrow!
"I profoundly believe it takes a lot of practice to become a moral slob." -- William F. Buckley
I really hate this damned machine I wish that they would sell it. It never does quite what I want But only what I tell it.
"I refuse to have a battle of wits with an unarmed person."
I see a good deal of talk from Washington about lowering taxes. I hope they do get 'em lowered enough so people can afford to pay 'em. -- Will Rogers
"I shot an arrow into the air, and it stuck." -- Graffito in Los Angeles
"I stayed up all night playing poker with tarot cards. I got a full house and four people died." -- Steven Wright
"I stopped believing in Santa Claus when I was six. Mother took me to see him in a department store and he asked for my autograph." -- Shirley Temple
"I think it is true for all _n. I was just playing it safe with _n >= 3 because I couldn't remember the proof." -- Baker, Pure Math 351a
"I think sex is better than logic, but I can't prove it."
I think that I shall never see A billboard lovely as a tree. Perhaps, unless the billboards fall I'll never see a tree at all. -- Ogden Nash
"I thought you were trying to get into shape." "I am. The shape I've selected is a triangle."
" ... I told my doctor I got all the exercise I needed being a pallbearer for all my friends who run and do exercises!" -- Winston Churchill
I took a course in speed reading and was able to read War and Peace in twenty minutes. It's about Russia. -- Woody Allen
I used to be an agnostic, but now I'm not so sure.
"I used to get high on life but lately I've built up a resistance."
"I used to think I was indecisive, but now I'm not so sure."
"I used to think that the brain was the most wonderful organ in my body. Then I realized who was telling me this." -- Emo Phillips
I used to work in a fire hydrant factory. You couldn't park anywhere near the place. -- Steven Wright
"I was gratified to be able to answer promptly, and I did. I said I didn't know." -- Mark Twain
"I was playing poker the other night ... with Tarot cards. I got a full house and four people died." -- Steven Wright
"I went into a general store, and they wouldn't sell me anything specific". -- Steven Wright
"I went to the museum where they had all the heads and arms from the statues that are in all the other museums." -- Steven Wright
I went to the race track once and bet on a horse that was so good that it took seven others to beat him!
"I wish there was a knob on the TV to turn up the intelligence. There's a knob called `brightness', but it doesn't work." -- Gallagher
"I wouldn't recommend sex, drugs or insanity for everyone, but they've always worked for me." -- Hunter S. Thompson
"I'd give my right arm to be ambidextrous."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I did my own thing and now I've got to undo it."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I have to floss my cat."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I have to stay home and see if I snore."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I never go out on days that end in `Y.'"
"I'd love to go out with you, but I want to spend more time with my blender."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm attending the opening of my garage door."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm converting my calendar watch from Julian to Gregorian."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm doing door-to-door collecting for static cling."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm having all my plants neutered."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm staying home to work on my cottage cheese sculpture."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I'm taking punk totem pole carving."
"I'd love to go out with you, but I've been scheduled for a karma transplant."
"I'd love to go out with you, but it's my parakeet's bowling night."
"I'd love to go out with you, but my favorite commercial is on TV."
"I'd love to go out with you, but the last time I went out, I never came back."
"I'd love to go out with you, but the man on television told me to say tuned."
"I'd love to go out with you, but there are important world issues that need worrying about."
"I'd rather have a bottle in front of me than a frontal lobotomy."
I'll defend to the death your right to say that, but I never said I'd listen to it! -- Tom Galloway with apologies to Voltaire
"I'm a creationist; I refuse to believe that I could have evolved from man."
I'm a Lisp variable -- bind me!
"I'm all for computer dating, but I wouldn't want one to marry my sister."
I'm defending her honor, which is more than she ever did.
"I'm defending her honor, which is more than she ever did."
"I'm fed up to the ears with old men dreaming up wars for young men to die in." -- George McGovern
I'm going to Boston to see my doctor. He's a very sick man. -- Fred Allen
I'm going to live forever, or die trying! -- Spider Robinson
... I'm IMAGINING a sensuous GIRAFFE, CAVORTING in the BACK ROOM of a KOSHER DELI!!
"I'm in Pittsburgh. Why am I here?" -- Harold Urey, Nobel Laureate
i'm living so far beyond my income that we may almost be said to be living apart. -- e. e. cummings
"I'm not under the alkafluence of inkahol that some thinkle peep I am. It's just the drunker I sit here the longer I get."
"I'm prepared for all emergencies but totally unprepared for everyday life."
I'm proud to be paying taxes in the United States. The only thing is -- I could be just as proud for half the money. -- Arthur Godfrey
I'm rated PG-34!!
"I'm really enjoying not talking to you ... Let's not talk again ____REAL soon ..."
"I'm willing to sacrifice anything for this cause, even other people's lives"
I've enjoyed just about as much of this as I can stand.
I've found my niche. If you're wondering why I'm not there, there was this little hole in the bottom ... -- John Croll
I've given up reading books; I find it takes my mind off myself.
I've had a perfectly wonderful evening. But this wasn't it. -- Groucho Marx
I've known him as a man, as an adolescent and as a child -- sometimes on the same day.
"I've seen better heads on half a pint of beer."
"I've seen, I SAY, I've seen better heads on a mug of beer" -- Senator Claghorn
IBM had a PL/I, Its syntax worse than JOSS; And everywhere this language went, It was a total loss.
Idaho state law makes it illegal for a man to give his sweetheart a box of candy weighing less than fifty pounds.
Ideas don't stay in some minds very long because they don't like solitary confinement.
If a 6600 used paper tape instead of core memory, it would use up tape at about 30 miles/second. -- Grishman, Assembly Language Programming
If A = B and B = C, then A = C, except where void or prohibited by law. -- Roy Santoro
"If a camel flies, no one laughs if it doesn't get very far." -- Paul White
If a camel is a horse designed by a committee, then a consensus forecast is a camel's behind. -- Edgar R. Fiedler
If A equals success, then the formula is _A = _X + _Y + _Z. _X is work. _Y is play. _Z is keep your mouth shut. -- Albert Einstein
If a group of _N persons implements a COBOL compiler, there will be _N-1 passes. Someone in the group has to be the manager. -- T. Cheatham
If a listener nods his head when you're explaining your program, wake him up.
If a President doesn't do it to his wife, he'll do it to his country.
If all else fails, immortality can always be assured by spectacular error. -- John Kenneth Galbraith
If all the world's a stage, I want to operate the trap door. -- Paul Beatty
If all the world's economists were laid end to end, we wouldn't reach a conclusion. -- William Baumol
If anything can go wrong, it will.
If at first you don't succeed, give up, no use being a damn fool.
If at first you don't succeed, redefine success.
If bankers can count, how come they have eight windows and only four tellers?
"If dolphins are so smart, why did Flipper work for television?"
If entropy is increasing, where is it coming from?
If everybody minded their own business, the world would go around a deal faster. -- The Duchess, "Through the Looking Glass"
If everything is coming your way then you're in the wrong lane.
If God didn't mean for us to juggle, tennis balls wouldn't come three to a can.
If God had intended Man to Smoke, He would have set him on Fire.
If God had intended Man to Walk, He would have given him Feet.
If God had intended Man to Watch TV, He would have given him Rabbit Ears.
If God had intended Men to Smoke, He would have put Chimneys in their Heads.
If God had meant for us to be in the Army, we would have been born with green, baggy skin.
If God had meant for us to be naked, we would have been born that way.
If God had not given us sticky tape, it would have been necessary to invent it.
If God had wanted you to go around nude, He would have given you bigger hands.
If God is dead, who will save the Queen?
If God is perfect, why did He create discontinuous functions?
"If God lived on Earth, people would knock out all His windows." -- Yiddish saying
If God wanted us to be brave, why did he give us legs? -- Marvin Kitman
"If I am elected, the concrete barriers around the WHITE HOUSE will be replaced by tasteful foam replicas of ANN MARGARET!"
If I could drop dead right now, I'd be the happiest man alive! -- Samuel Goldwyn
If I don't see you in the future, I'll see you in the pasture.
If I had a plantation in Georgia and a home in Hell, I'd sell the plantation and go home. -- Eugene P. Gallagher
If I had any humility I would be perfect. -- Ted Turner
"If I had only known, I would have been a locksmith." -- Albert Einstein
If I traveled to the end of the rainbow As Dame Fortune did intend, Murphy would be there to tell me The pot's at the other end. -- Bert Whitney
If ignorance is bliss, why aren't there more happy people?
If it's Tuesday, this must be someone else's fortune.
If life is a stage, I want some better lighting.
If little else, the brain is an educational toy. -- Tom Robbins
If little green men land in your back yard, hide any little green women you've got in the house. -- Mike Harding, "The Armchair Anarchist's Almanac"
If mathematically you end up with the wrong answer, try multiplying by the page number.
If money can't buy happiness, I guess you'll just have to rent it.
If one studies too zealously, one easily loses his pants. -- A. Einstein.
If only God would give me some clear sign! Like making a large deposit in my name at a Swiss bank. -- Woody Allen, "Without Feathers"
If only I could be respected without having to be respectable.
If only one could get that wonderful feeling of accomplishment without having to accomplish anything.
If Patrick Henry thought that taxation without representation was bad, he should see how bad it is with representation.
If someone had told me I would be Pope one day, I would have studied harder. -- Pope John Paul I
"If that makes any sense to you, you have a big problem." -- C. Durance, Computer Science 234
If the aborigine drafted an IQ test, all of Western civilization would presumably flunk it. -- Stanley Garn
If the code and the comments disagree, then both are probably wrong. -- Norm Schryer
"If the King's English was good enough for Jesus, it's good enough for me!" -- "Ma" Ferguson, Governor of Texas (circa 1920)
If the odds are a million to one against something occurring, chances are 50-50 it will.
If there are epigrams, there must be meta-epigrams.
If there is a possibility of several things going wrong, the one that will cause the most damage will be the one to go wrong.
If there is no God, who pops up the next Kleenex? -- Art Hoppe
If they can make penicillin out of moldy bread, they can sure make something out of you. -- Muhammad Ali
If this fortune didn't exist, somebody would have invented it.
If this is timesharing, give me my share right now.
If time heals all wounds, how come the belly button stays the same?
If today is the first day of the rest of your life, what the hell was yesterday?
If two men agree on everything, you may be sure that one of them is doing the thinking. -- Lyndon Baines Johnson
If two wrongs don't make a right, try three. -- Laurence J. Peter
"If value corrupts then absolute value corrupts absolutely"
"If we were meant to fly, we wouldn't keep losing our luggage."
If you are a fatalist, what can you do about it? -- Ann Edwards-Duff
"If you can count your money, you don't have a billion dollars." -- J. Paul Getty
If you can lead it to water and force it to drink, it isn't a horse.
If you can read this, you're too close.
If you can survive death, you can probably survive anything.
If you can't be good, be careful. If you can't be careful, give me a call.
If you can't learn to do it well, learn to enjoy doing it badly.
If you cannot convince them, confuse them. -- Harry S Truman
If you didn't get caught, did you really do it?
If you don't care where you are, then you ain't lost.
If you don't go to other men's funerals they won't go to yours. -- Clarence Day
If you don't have a nasty obituary you probably didn't matter. -- Freeman Dyson
"If you don't want your dog to have bad breath, do what I do: Pour a little Lavoris in the toilet." -- Jay Leno
If you eat a live frog in the morning, nothing worse will happen to either of you for the rest of the day.
"If you ever want to get anywhere in politics, my boy, you're going to have to get a toehold in the public eye."
If you explain so clearly that nobody can misunderstand, somebody will.
If you give Congress a chance to vote on both sides of an issue, it will always do it. -- Les Aspin, D., Wisconsin
"If you go on with this nuclear arms race, all you are going to do is make the rubble bounce" -- Winston Churchill
If you had any brains, you'd be dangerous.
If you have a procedure with 10 parameters, you probably missed some.
"If you have to hate, hate gently"
If you just try long enough and hard enough, you can always manage to boot yourself in the posterior. -- A. J. Liebling
If you keep anything long enough, you can throw it away.
If you live in a country run by committee, be on the committee. -- Graham Summer
If you live to the age of a hundred you have it made because very few people die past the age of a hundred. -- George Burns
If you make people think they're thinking, they'll love you; but if you really make them think they'll hate you.
If you only have a hammer, you tend to see every problem as a nail. -- Maslow
If you perceive that there are four possible ways in which a procedure can go wrong, and circumvent these, then a fifth way will promptly develop.
If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous, he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and a man. -- Mark Twain
If you sit down at a poker game and don't see a sucker, get up. You're the sucker.
If you stand on your head, you will get footprints in your hair.
If you think education is expensive, try ignorance. -- Derek Bok, president of Harvard
If you think last Tuesday was a drag, wait till you see what happens tomorrow!
If you think nobody cares if you're alive, try missing a couple of car payments. -- Earl Wilson
If you think the problem is bad now, just wait until we've solved it. -- Arthur Kasspe
If you think the United States has stood still, who built the largest shopping center in the world? -- Richard M. Nixon
If you think the United States has stood still, who built the largest shopping center in the world? -- Richard Nixon
If you took all the students that felt asleep in class and laid them end to end, they'd be a lot more comfortable. -- "Graffiti in the Big Ten"
"If you understand what you're doing, you're not learning anything." -- A. L.
If you want divine justice, die. -- Nick Seldon
If you want to know what god thinks of money, just look at the people he gave it to. -- Dorthy Parker
If you want your spouse to listen and pay strict attention to every word you say, talk in your sleep.
If you wish to live wisely, ignore sayings -- including this one.
If you're going to do something tonight that you'll be sorry for tomorrow morning, sleep late. -- Henny Youngman
If you're happy, you're successful.
If you're not part of the solution, you're part of the precipitate.
If you're not very clever you should be conciliatory. -- Benjamin Disraeli
"If you've done six impossible things before breakfast, why not round it off with dinner at Milliway's, the restaurant at the end of the universe?"
If you've seen one redwood, you've seen them all. -- Ronald Reagan
Illinois isn't exactly the land that God forgot -- it's more like the land He's trying to ignore.
Imagination is the one weapon in the war against reality. -- Jules de Gaultier
Immigration is the sincerest form of flattery. -- Jack Paar
Immortality -- a fate worse than death. -- Edgar A. Shoaff
Impossible, adj.: (1) I wouldn't like it and when it happens I won't approve; (2) I can't be bothered; (3) God can't be bothered. Meaning (3) may
-- Chad C. Mulligan, "The Hipcrime Vocab"
In 1750 Issac Newton became discouraged when he fell up a flight of stairs.
In 1869 the waffle iron was invented for people who had wrinkled waffles.
In 1880 the French captured Detroit but gave it back ... they couldn't get parts.
In 1914, the first crossword puzzle was printed in a newspaper. The creator received $4000 down ... and $3000 across.
In 1915 pancake make-up was invented but most people still preferred syrup.
In a five year period we can get one superb programming language. Only we can't control when the five year period will begin.
In a medium in which a News Piece takes a minute and an "In-Depth" Piece takes two minutes, the Simple will drive out the Complex. -- Frank Mankiewicz
In a museum in Havana, there are two skulls of Christopher Columbus, "one when he was a boy and one when he was a man." -- Mark Twain
In America, any boy may become president and I suppose that's just one of the risks he takes. -- Adlai Stevenson
In an organization, each person rises to the level of his own incompetency -- The Peter Principle
In any formula, constants (especially those obtained from handbooks) are to be treated as variables.
"In any world menu, Canada must be considered the vichyssoise of nations -- it's cold, half-French, and difficult to stir." -- Stuart Keate
In Blythe, California, a city ordinance declares that a person must own at least two cows before he can wear cowboy boots in public.
In Boston, it is illegal to hold frog-jumping contests in nightclubs.
In case of atomic attack, the federal ruling against prayer in schools will be temporarily canceled.
In case of injury notify your superior immediately. He'll kiss it and make it better.
In Corning, Iowa, it's a misdemeanor for a man to ask his wife to ride in any motor vehicle.
"In defeat, unbeatable; in victory, unbearable." -- Winston Curchill, of Montgomery
In Denver it is unlawful to lend your vacuum cleaner to your next-door neighbor.
In Devon, Connecticut, it is unlawful to walk backwards after sunset.
In English, every word can be verbed. Would that it were so in our programming languages.
In Greene, New York, it is illegal to eat peanuts and walk backwards on the sidewalks when a concert is on.
In Lexington, Kentucky, it's illegal to carry an ice cream cone in your pocket.
"In order to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first create the universe." -- Carl Sagan, Cosmos
In Pocataligo, Georgia, it is a violation for a woman over 200 pounds and attired in shorts to pilot or ride in an airplane.
In Pocatello, Idaho, a law passed in 1912 provided that "The carrying of concealed weapons is forbidden, unless same are exhibited to public view."
In Seattle, Washington, it is illegal to carry a concealed weapon that is over six feet in length.
In seeking the unattainable, simplicity only gets in the way. -- Epigrams in Programming, ACM SIGPLAN Sept. 1982
"In short, _N is Richardian if, and only if, _N is not Richardian."
In specifications, Murphy's Law supersedes Ohm's.
In Tennessee, it is illegal to shoot any game other than whales from a moving automobile.
In the beginning was the word. But by the time the second word was added to it, there was trouble. For with it came syntax ... -- John Simon
In the force if Yoda's so strong, construct a sentence with words in the proper order then why can't he?
In the land of the dark, the Ship of the Sun is driven by the Grateful Dead. -- Egyptian Book of the Dead
In the long run, every program becomes rococo, and then rubble. -- Alan Perlis
In those days he was wiser than he is now -- he used to frequently take my advice. -- Winston Churchill
In Tulsa, Oklahoma, it is against the law to open a soda bottle without the supervision of a licensed engineer.
In West Union, Ohio, No married man can go flying without his spouse along at any time, unless he has been married for more than 12 months.
Incumbent, n.: Person of liveliest interest to the outcumbents. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Indifference will be the downfall of mankind, but who cares?
Individualists unite!
Information Center, n.: A room staffed by professional computer people whose job it is to tell you why you cannot have the information you require.
Ingrate, n.: A man who bites the hand that feeds him, and then complains of indigestion.
Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere. -- Martin Luther King, Jr.
Innovation is hard to schedule. -- Dan Fylstra
Insanity is hereditary. You get it from your kids.
Insanity is the final defense ... It's hard to get a refund when the salesman is sniffing your crotch and baying at the moon.
Intolerance is the last defense of the insecure.
Iron Law of Distribution: Them that has, gets.
"Irrationality is the square root of all evil" -- Douglas Hofstadter
Is it possible that software is not like anything else, that it is meant to be discarded: that the whole point is to always see it as a soap bubble?
Is your job running? You'd better go catch it!
Isn't it interesting that the same people who laugh at science fiction listen to weather forecasts and economists? -- Kelvin Throop III
Isn't it strange that the same people that laugh at gypsy fortune tellers take economists seriously?
It has been said that man is a rational animal. All my life I have been searching for evidence which could support this. -- Bertrand Russell
It has just been discovered that research causes cancer in rats.
It is against the law for a monster to enter the corporate limits of Urbana, Illinois.
It is better for civilization to be going down the drain than to be coming up it. -- Henry Allen
It is better never to have been born. But who among us has such luck? One in a million, perhaps.
It is better to kiss an avocado than to get in a fight with an aardvark
"It is easier for a camel to pass through the eye of a needle if it is lightly greased." -- Kehlog Albran, "The Profit"
It is easier to change the specification to fit the program than vice versa.
It is easier to get forgiveness than permission.
It is easier to write an incorrect program than understand a correct one.
It is illegal to drive more than two thousand sheep down Hollywood Boulevard at one time.
It is illegal to say "Oh, Boy" in Jonesboro, Georgia.
It is impossible to experience one's death objectively and still carry a tune. -- Woody Allen
It is impossible to make anything foolproof because fools are so ingenious.
It is impossible to travel faster than light, and certainly not desirable, as one's hat keeps blowing off. -- Woody Allen
It is Mr. Mellon's credo that $200,000,000 can do no wrong. Our offense consists in doubting it. -- Justice Robert H. Jackson
It is much easier to suggest solutions when you know nothing about the problem.
It is not enough to succeed. Others must fail. -- Gore Vidal
It is not true that life is one damn thing after another -- it's one damn thing over and over. -- Edna St. Vincent Millay
It is now 10 p.m. Do you know where Henry Kissinger is? -- Elizabeth Carpenter
It is now pitch dark. If you proceed, you will likely fall into a pit.
It is one of the superstitions of the human mind to have imagined that virginity could be a virtue. -- Voltaire
It is only people of small moral stature who have to stand on their dignity.
It is only the great men who are truly obscene. If they had not dared to be obscene, they could never have dared to be great. -- Havelock Ellis
It is the business of little minds to shrink. -- Carl Sandburg
It is the business of the future to be dangerous. -- Hawkwind
It is very difficult to prophesy, especially when it pertains to the future.
It looks like blind screaming hedonism won out.
It may be bad manners to talk with your mouth full, but it isn't too good either if you speak when your head is empty.
It may be that your whole purpose in life is simply to serve as a warning to others.
"It runs like _x, where _x is something unsavory" -- Prof. Romas Aleliunas, CS 435
It seems like the less a statesman amounts to, the more he loves the flag.
It shall be unlawful for any suspicious person to be within the municipality. -- Local ordinance, Euclid Ohio
It was a book to kill time for those who liked it better dead.
"It was a virgin forest, a place where the Hand of Man had never set foot."
It wasn't that she had a rose in her teeth, exactly. It was more like the rose and the teeth were in the same glass.
It will be advantageous to cross the great stream ... the Dragon is on the wing in the Sky ... the Great Man rouses himself to his Work.
It's a damn poor mind that can only think of one way to spell a word. -- Andrew Jackson
"It's a dog-eat-dog world out there, and I'm wearing Milkbone underwear."
It's a good thing we don't get all the government we pay for.
"It's a small world, but I wouldn't want to have to paint it." -- Steven Wright
"It's a summons." "What's a summons?" "It means summon's in trouble." -- Rocky and Bullwinkle
It's a very *__UN*lucky week in which to be took dead. -- Churchy La Femme
It's always darkest just before it gets pitch black.
"It's bad luck to be superstitious." -- Andrew W. Mathis
It's better to be wanted for murder that not to be wanted at all. -- Marty Winch
It's easier to fight for one's principles than to live up to them.
It's easier to get forgiveness for being wrong than forgiveness for being right.
"It's Fabulous! We haven't seen anything like it in the last half an hour!" -- Macy's
It's illegal in Wilbur, Washington, to ride an ugly horse.
"It's kind of fun to do the impossible." -- Walt Disney
"It's Like This"  Even the samurai have teddy bears, and even the teddy bears get drunk.
It's lucky you're going so slowly, because you're going in the wrong direction.
"It's men like him that give the Y chromosome a bad name."
It's more than magnificent -- it's mediocre. -- Sam Goldwyn
It's not an optical illusion, it just looks like one. -- Phil White
"It's not Camelot, but it's not Cleveland, either." -- Kevin White, mayor of Boston
It's not enough to be Hungarian; you must have talent too. -- Alexander Korda
"It's not just a computer -- it's your ass." -- Cal Keegan
It's not reality or how you perceive things that's important -- it's what you're taking for it...
It's not so hard to lift yourself by your bootstraps once you're off the ground. -- Daniel B. Luten
It's not that I'm afraid to die. I just don't want to be there when it happens. -- Woody Allen
It's not the valleys in life I dread so much as the dips. -- Garfield
It's raisins that make Post Raisin Bran so raisiny ...
It's really quite a simple choice: Life, Death, or Los Angeles.
It's so stupid of modern civilization to have given up believing in the Devil when he is the only explanation of it.
It's the thought, if any, that counts!
Jacquin's Postulate on Democratic Government: No man's life, liberty, or property are safe while the legislature is in session.
James Joyce -- an essentially private man who wished his total indifference to public notice to be universally recognized. -- Tom Stoppard
Jenkinson's Law: It won't work.
Jesus Saves, Moses Invests, But only Buddha pays Dividends.
Job Placement, n.: Telling your boss what he can do with your job.
Joe's sister puts spaghetti in her shoes!
Johnson's First Law: When any mechanical contrivance fails, it will do so at the most inconvenient possible time.
Join in the new game that's sweeping the country. It's called "Bureaucracy". Everybody stands in a circle. The first person to do anything loses.
Join the march to save individuality!
Jone's Law: The man who smiles when things go wrong has thought of someone to blame it on.
Jone's Motto: Friends come and go, but enemies accumulate.
Just about every computer on the market today runs Unix, except the Mac (and nobody cares about it). -- Bill Joy 6/21/85
Just because everything is different doesn't mean anything has changed. -- Irene Peter
Just because you're paranoid doesn't mean they AREN'T after you.
Just because your doctor has a name for your condition doesn't mean he knows what it is.
Just go with the flow control, roll with the crunches, and, when you get a prompt, type like hell.
"Just once, I wish we would encounter an alien menace that wasn't immune to bullets" -- The Brigader, "Dr. Who"
Just remember: when you go to court, you are trusting your fate to twelve people that weren't smart enough to get out of jury duty!
Just when you thought you were winning the rat race, along comes a faster rat!!!
Justice always prevails ... three times out of seven! -- Michael J. Wagner
Justice is incidental to law and order. -- J. Edgar Hoover
Justice, n.: A decision in your favor.
Kansas state law requires pedestrians crossing the highways at night to wear tail lights.
Katz' Law: Man and nations will act rationally when all other possibilities have been exhausted.
Keep America beautiful. Swallow your beer cans.
Keep Cool, but Don't Freeze - Hellman's Mayonnaise
Keep emotionally active. Cater to your favorite neurosis.
Keep grandma off the streets -- legalize bingo.
Kerr's Three Rules for a Successful College: Have plenty of football for the alumni, sex for the students, and parking for the faculty.
Kin, n.: An affliction of the blood
Kinkler's First Law: Responsibility always exceeds authority.  Kinkler's Second Law: All the easy problems have been solved.
"Kirk to Enterprise -- beam down yeoman Rand and a six-pack."
Kirkland, Illinois, law forbids bees to fly over the village or through any of its streets.
Kiss me twice. I'm schizophrenic.
Kiss your keyboard goodbye!
Klein bottle for rent -- inquire within.
Klein bottle for sale ... inquire within.
Kleptomaniac, n.: A rich thief. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Know thyself. If you need help, call the C.I.A.
Know what I hate most? Rhetorical questions. -- Henry N. Camp
Krogt, n. (chemical symbol: Kr): The metallic silver coating found on fast-food game cards. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Labor, n.: One of the processes by which A acquires property for B. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Lackland's Laws: (1) Never be first. (2) Never be last. (3) Never volunteer for anything
Laetrile is the pits
Langsam's Laws: (1) Everything depends. (2) Nothing is always. (3) Everything is sometimes.
Larkinson's Law: All laws are basically false.
"Last week a cop stopped me in my car. He asked me if I had a police record. I said, no, but I have the new DEVO album. Cops have no sense of humor."
Last yeer I kudn't spel Engineer. Now I are won.
Laugh at your problems; everybody else does.
"Laughter is the closest distance between two people." -- Victor Borge
Law of Probable Dispersal: Whatever it is that hits the fan will not be evenly distributed.
Law of the Perversity of Nature: You cannot successfully determine beforehand which side of the bread to butter.
Learned men are the cisterns of knowledge, not the fountainheads.
Learning French is trivial: the word for horse is cheval, and everything else follows in the same way. -- Alan J. Perlis
Left to themselves, things tend to go from bad to worse.
Legalize free-enterprise murder: why should governments have all the fun?
Leibowitz's Rule: When hammering a nail, you will never hit your finger if you hold the hammer with both hands.
Let He who taketh the Plunge Remember to return it by Tuesday.
Let us live!!! Let us love!!! Let us share the deepest secrets of our souls!!!  You first.
Lewis's Law of Travel: The first piece of luggage out of the chute doesn't belong to anyone, ever.
Liar, n.: A lawyer with a roving commission. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Liberty is always dangerous, but it is the safest thing we have. -- Harry Emerson Fosdick
Lie, n.: A very poor substitute for the truth, but the only one discovered to date.
Lieberman's Law: Everybody lies, but it doesn't matter since nobody listens.
Life is a whim of several billion cells to be you for a while.
Life is a yo-yo, and mankind ties knots in the string.
"Life is like a bowl of soup with hairs floating on it. You have to eat it nevertheless." -- Flaubert
"Life is like a buffet; it's not good but there's plenty of it."
Life is like a simile.
Life is like an analogy
Life is like an onion: you peel off layer after layer, then you find there is nothing in it.
"Life is too important to take seriously." -- Corky Siegel
"Life may have no meaning -- or even worse, it may have a meaning of which I disapprove."
"Life to you is a bold and dashing responsibility" -- a Mary Chung's fortune cookie
"Life would be much simpler and things would get done much faster if it weren't for other people" -- Blore
Life would be so much easier if we could just look at the source code.
"Life, loathe it or ignore it, you can't like it." -- Marvin, "Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy"
Like so many Americans, she was trying to construct a life that made sense from things she found in gift shops. -- Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
Like the ski resort of girls looking for husbands and husbands looking for girls, the situation is not as symmetrical as it might seem. -- Alan McKay
Limericks are art forms complex, Their topics run chiefly to sex. They usually have virgins, And masculine urgin's, And other erotic effects.
Line Printer paper is strongest at the perforations.
Living in LA is like not having a date on Saturday night. -- Candice Bergen
Living on Earth may be expensive, but it includes an annual free trip around the Sun.
Living your life is a task so difficult, it has never been attempted before.
Lizzie Borden took an axe, And plunged it deep into the VAX; Don't you envy people who Do all the things ___YOU want to do?
Loan-department manager: "There isn't any fine print. At these interest rates, we don't need it."
Lockwood's Long Shot: The chances of getting eaten up by a lion on Main Street aren't one in a million, but once would be enough.
Logic is a little bird, sitting in a tree; that smells *_____awful*.
... Logically incoherent, semantically incomprehensible, and legally ... impeccable!
Logicians have but ill defined As rational the human kind. Logic, they say, belongs to man, But let them prove it if they can. -- Oliver Goldsmith
Look out! Behind you!
Look, we play the Star Spangled Banner before every game. You want us to pay income taxes, too? -- Bill Veeck, Chicago White Sox
Loose bits sink chips.
Losing your drivers' license is just God's way of saying "BOOGA, BOOGA!"
Lost interest? It's so bad I've lost apathy.
Loud burping while walking around the airport is prohibited in Halstead, Kansas.
Love and scandal are the best sweeteners of tea.
Love and scandal are the best sweeteners of tea.
Love at first sight is one of the greatest labor-saving devices the world has ever seen.
Love cannot be much younger than the lust for murder. -- Sigmund Freud
"Love is an ideal thing, marriage a real thing; a confusion of the real with the ideal never goes unpunished." -- Goethe
Love is sentimental measles.
Love is the triumph of imagination over intelligence. -- H. L. Mencken
Love means having to say you're sorry every five minutes.
Love thy neighbor as thyself, but choose your neighborhood. -- Louise Beal
Love your enemies: they'll go crazy trying to figure out what you're up to.
Lowery's Law: If it jams -- force it. If it breaks, it needed replacing anyway.
LSD melts in your mind, not in your hand.
Lubarsky's Law of Cybernetic Entomology: There's always one more bug.
Lunatic Asylum, n.: The place where optimism most flourishes.
Lysistrata had a good idea.
"MacDonald has the gift on compressing the largest amount of words into the smallest amount of thoughts." -- Winston Churchill
Machine-Independent, adj.: Does not run on any existing machine.
Machines certainly can solve problems, store information, correlate, and play games -- but not with pleasure. -- Leo Rosten
Mad, adj.: Affected with a high degree of intellectual independence ... -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Madam, there's no such thing as a tough child -- if you parboil them first for seven hours, they always come out tender. -- W. C. Fields
Magnocartic, adj.: Any automobile that, when left unattended, attracts shopping carts. -- Sniglets, "Rich Hall & Friends"
Magpie, n.: A bird whose theivish disposition suggested to someone that it might be taught to talk. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
obtain a correspondence with the theory.
Main's Law: For every action there is an equal and opposite government program.
Maintainer's Motto: If we can't fix it, it ain't broke.
Majority, n.: That quality that distinguishes a crime from a law.
Make it myself? But I'm a physical organic chemist!
Malek's Law: Any simple idea will be worded in the most complicated way.
Man 1: Ask me the what the most important thing about telling a good joke is.  Man 2: OK, what is the most impo --  Man 1: ______TIMING!
"Man invented language to satisfy his deep need to complain." -- Lily Tomlin
Man is a rational animal who always loses his temper when he is called upon to act in accordance with the dictates of reason. -- Oscar Wilde
Man is the best computer we can put aboard a spacecraft ... and the only one that can be mass produced with unskilled labor. -- Wernher von Braun
Man is the only animal that blushes -- or needs to. -- Mark Twain
Man is the only animal that can remain on friendly terms with the victims he intends to eat until he eats them. -- Samuel Butler
Man is the only animal that can remain on friendly terms with the victims he intends to eat until he eats them. -- Samuel Butler (1835-1902)
Man usually avoids attributing cleverness to somebody else -- unless it is an enemy. -- Albert Einstein
Mandrell: "You know what I think?" Doctor: "Ah, ah that's a catch question. With a brain your size you don't think, right?" -- Dr. Who
Mark's Dental-Chair Discovery: Dentists are incapable of asking questions that require a simple yes or no answer.
Marriage is the only adventure open to the cowardly. -- Voltaire
Maternity pay? Now every Tom, Dick and Harry will get pregnant. -- Malcolm Smith
Math is like love -- a simple idea but it can get complicated. -- R. Drabek
"Matrimony isn't a word, it's a sentence."
Matter cannot be created or destroyed, nor can it be returned without a receipt.
Maturity is only a short break in adolescence. -- Jules Feiffer
May a Misguided Platypus lay its Eggs in your Jockey Shorts
May Euell Gibbons eat your only copy of the manual!
May the Fleas of a Thousand Camels infest one of your Erogenous Zones.
May your Tongue stick to the Roof of your Mouth with the Force of a Thousand Caramels.
Maybe Computer Science should be in the College of Theology. -- R. S. Barton
Maybe you can't buy happiness, but these days you can certainly charge it.
McGowan's Madison Avenue Axiom: If an item is advertised as "under $50", you can bet it's not $19.95.
Meader's Law: Whatever happens to you, it will previously have happened to everyone you know, only more so.
Measure with a micrometer. Mark with chalk. Cut with an axe.
Meeting, n.: An assembly of people coming together to decide what person or department not represented in the room must solve a problem.
Mencken and Nathan's Fifteenth Law of The Average American: The worst actress in the company is always the manager's wife.
Mencken and Nathan's Ninth Law of The Average American: The quality of a champagne is judged by the amount of noise the cork makes when it is popped.
Mencken and Nathan's Second Law of The Average American: All the postmasters in small towns read all the postcards.
Menu, n.: A list of dishes which the restaurant has just run out of.
Meskimen's Law: There's never time to do it right, but there's always time to do it over.
MESSAGE ACKNOWLEDGED -- The Pershing II missiles have been launched.
Message will arrive in the mail. Destroy, before the FBI sees it.
Mickey Mouse wears a Spiro Agnew watch.
Micro Credo: Never trust a computer bigger than you can lift.
"Microwave oven? Whaddya mean, it's a microwave oven? I've been watching Channel 4 on the thing for two weeks."
"Might as well be frank, monsieur. It would take a miracle to get you out of Casablanca and the Germans have outlawed miracles."
Mike: "The Fourth Dimension is a shambles?" Bernie: "Nobody ever empties the ashtrays. People are SO inconsiderate." -- Gary Trudeau, "Doonesbury"
Miksch's Law: If a string has one end, then it has another end.
Military intelligence is a contradiction in terms. -- Groucho Marx
Military justice is to justice what military music is to music. -- Groucho Marx
Millihelen, adj: The amount of beauty required to launch one ship.
Millions long for immortality who do not know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon. -- Susan Ertz
Minnie Mouse is a slow maze learner.
Minors in Kansas City, Missouri, are not allowed to purchase cap pistols; they may buy shotguns freely, however.
Misery loves company, but company does not reciprocate.
Misery no longer loves company. Nowadays it insists on it. -- Russell Baker
Misfortune, n.: The kind of fortune that never misses. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Miss, n.: A title with which we brand unmarried women to indicate that they are in the market. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Mistakes are often the stepping stones to utter failure.
Mitchell's Law of Committees: Any simple problem can be made insoluble if enough meetings are held to discuss it.
Modern man is the missing link between apes and human beings.
Mollison's Bureaucracy Hypothesis: If an idea can survive a bureaucratic review and be implemented it wasn't worth doing.
Monday is an awful way to spend one seventh of your life.
Monday, n.: In Christian countries, the day after the baseball game. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Money is better than poverty, if only for financial reasons.
Money is the root of all evil, and man needs roots
Money is the root of all wealth.
Moon, n.: 1. A celestial object whose phase is very important to hackers. See PHASE OF THE MOON. 2. Dave Moon (MOON@MC).
Mophobia, n.: Fear of being verbally abused by a Mississippian.
Mosher's Law of Software Engineering: Don't worry if it doesn't work right. If everything did, you'd be out of a job.
Most people can't understand how others can blow their noses differently than they do. -- Turgenev
Most people wouldn't know music if it came up and bit them on the ass. -- Frank Zappa
Mother is far too clever to understand anything she does not like. -- Arnold Bennett
Mother is the invention of necessity.
Mother told me to be good, but she's been wrong before.
Mr. Cole's Axiom: The sum of the intelligence on the planet is a constant; the population is growing.
Murphy's Law is recursive. Washing your car to make it rain doesn't work.
Murphy's Law of Research: Enough research will tend to support your theory.
"Murphy's Law, that brash proletarian restatement of Godel's Theorem ..." -- Thomas Pynchon, "Gravity's Rainbow"
Mustgo, n.: Any item of food that has been sitting in the refrigerator so long it has become a science project. -- Sniglets, "Rich Hall & Friends"
"My advice to you, my violent friend, is to seek out gold and sit on it." -- "Grendel", by John Gardner
"My doctor told me to stop having intimate dinners for four. Unless there are three other people." -- Orson Welles
"My life is a soap opera, but who has the rights?" -- MadameX
My mother loved children -- she would have given anything if I had been one. -- Groucho Marx
My opinions may have changed, but not the fact that I am right.
... My pants just went on a wild rampage through a Long Island Bowling Alley!!
"My pants just went on a wild rampage through a Long Island Bowling Alley!!" -- Zippy the Pinhead
My theology, briefly, is that the universe was dictated but not signed. -- Christopher Morley
"My weight is perfect for my height -- which varies"
Naeser's Law: You can make it foolproof, but you can't make it damnfoolproof.
Nature is by and large to be found out of doors, a location where, it cannot be argued, there are never enough comfortable chairs. -- Fran Leibowitz
Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power. -- Abraham Lincoln
Necessity is a mother.
Neckties strangle clear thinking. -- Lin Yutang
Never be led astray onto the path of virtue.
Never call a man a fool. Borrow from him.
Never call a man a fool; borrow from him.
Never commit yourself! Let someone else commit you.
Never count your chickens before they rip your lips off
Never eat more than you can lift. -- Miss Piggy
Never hit a man with glasses. Hit him with a baseball bat.
Never let your schooling interfere with your education.
Never let your sense of morals prevent you from doing what is right. -- Salvor Hardin, "Foundation"
Never make anything simple and efficient when a way can be found to make it complex and wonderful.
Never offend people with style when you can offend them with substance. -- Sam Brown, "The Washington Post", January 26, 1977
Never put off till tomorrow what you can avoid all together.
Never put off until tomorrow what you can do today. There might be a law against it by that time.
Never settle with words what you can accomplish with a flame thrower.
Never tell a lie unless it is absolutely convenient.
Never try to outstubborn a cat. -- Lazarus Long, "Time Enough for Love"
Never underestimate the bandwidth of a station wagon full of tapes. -- Dr. Warren Jackson, Director, UTCS
"Never underestimate the power of a small tactical nuclear weapon."
Never worry about theory as long as the machinery does what it's supposed to do. -- R. A. Heinlein
New crypt. See /usr/news/crypt.
New Hampshire law forbids you to tap your feet, nod your head, or in any way keep time to the music in a tavern, restaurant, or cafe.
New members are urgently needed in the Society for Prevention of Cruelty to Yourself. Apply within.
New members urgently required for SUICIDE CLUB, Watford area. -- Monty Python's Big Red Book
New systems generate new problems.
New Year's Eve is the time of year when a man most feels his age, and his wife most often reminds him to act it. -- Webster's Unafraid Dictionary
New York is real. The rest is done with mirrors.
New York's got the ways and means; Just won't let you be. -- The Grateful Dead
Newlan's Truism: An "acceptable" level of unemployment means that the government economist to whom it is acceptable still has a job.
NEWS FLASH!! Today the East German pole-vault champion became the West German pole-vault champion.
*** NEWSFLASH *** Russian tanks steamrolling through New Jersey!!!! Details at eleven!
Newton's Fourth Law: Every action has an equal and opposite satisfaction.
Newton's Little-Known Seventh Law: A bird in the hand is safer than one overhead.
Next Friday will not be your lucky day. As a matter of fact, you don't have a lucky day this year.
Next to being shot at and missed, nothing is really quite as satisfying as an income tax refund. -- F. J. Raymond
"Nice boy, but about as sharp as a sack of wet mice." -- Foghorn Leghorn
Nihilism should commence with oneself.
"Nirvana? Thats the place where the powers that be and their friends hang out. -- Zonker Harris
No animal should ever jump on the dining room furniture unless absolutely certain he can hold his own in conversation. -- Fran Lebowitz
No good deed goes unpunished. -- Clare Boothe Luce
No man in the world has more courage than the man who can stop after eating one peanut. -- Channing Pollock
No man is an island, but some of us are long peninsulas.
No matter how subtle the wizard, a knife in the shoulder blades will seriously cramp his style.
No matter what other nations may say about the United States, immigration is still the sincerest form of flattery.
No one can make you feel inferior without your consent. -- Eleanor Roosevelt
"No one gets too old to learn a new way of being stupid."
No problem is so formidable that you can't just walk away from it.
No problem is so large it can't be fit in somewhere.
No violence, gentlemen -- no violence, I beg of you! Consider the furniture! -- Sherlock Holmes
"No, `Eureka' is Greek for `This bath is too hot.'" -- Dr. Who
Nobody can be exactly like me. Sometimes even I have trouble doing it. -- Tallulah Bankhead
NOBODY EXPECTS THE SPANISH INQUISITION
Nobody said computers were going to be polite.
Nobody wants constructive criticism. It's all we can do to put up with constructive praise.
Non-Reciprocal Laws of Expectations: Negative expectations yield negative results. Positive expectations yield negative results.
Non-sequiturs make me eat lampshades.
Noncombatant, n.: A dead Quaker. -- Ambrose Bierce
Nondeterminism means never having to say you are wrong.
"Nondeterminism means never having to say you are wrong."
Nostalgia isn't what it used to be.
"Not Hercules could have knock'd out his brains, for he had none." -- Shakespeare
"Not only is this incomprehensible, but the ink is ugly and the paper is from the wrong kind of tree." -- Professor W.
Nothing astonishes men so much as common sense and plain dealing.
Nothing cures insomnia like the realization that it's time to get up.
Nothing is faster than the speed of light ...  To prove this to yourself, try opening the refrigerator door before the light comes on.
Nothing is illegal if one hundred businessmen decide to do it. -- Andrew Young
Nothing is more admirable than the fortitude with which millionaires tolerate the disadvantages of their wealth. -- Nero Wolfe
Nothing makes one so vain as being told that one is a sinner. Conscience makes egotists of us all. -- Oscar Wilde
Nothing recedes like success. -- Walter Winchell
Nothing takes the taste out of peanut butter quite like unrequited love. -- Charlie Brown
November, n.: The eleventh twelfth of a weariness. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Now and then an innocent person is sent to the legislature.
Now I lay me down to sleep I pray the double lock will keep; May no brick through the window break, And, no one rob me till I awake.
"Now is the time for all good men to come to." -- Walt Kelly
"Now this is a totally brain damaged algorithm. Gag me with a smurfette." -- P. Buhr, Computer Science 354
"Nuclear war can ruin your whole compile." -- Karl Lehenbauer
"Nuclear war would really set back cable." -- Ted Turner
[Nuclear war] ... may not be desirable. -- Edwin Meese III
Nudists are people who wear one-button suits.
(null cookie; hope that's ok)
Numeric stability is probably not all that important when you're guessing.
O'Toole's Commentary on Murphy's Law: Murphy was an optimist.
"Of ______course it's the murder weapon. Who would frame someone with a fake?"
Of all the animals, the boy is the most unmanageable. -- Plato
"Of course power tools and alcohol don't mix. Everyone knows power tools aren't soluble in alcohol ..." -- Crazy Nigel
Of course there's no reason for it, it's just our policy.
blazer.
Office Automation, n.: The use of computers to improve efficiency by removing anyone you would want to talk with over coffee.
Ogden's Law: The sooner you fall behind, the more time you have to catch up.
Oh Dad! We're ALL Devo!
Oh don't the days seem lank and long When all goes right and none goes wrong, And isn't your life extremely flat With nothing whatever to grumble at!
Oh, I am a C programmer and I'm okay I muck with indices and structs all day And when it works, I shout hoo-ray Oh, I am a C programmer and I'm okay
Oh, I don't blame Congress. If I had $600 billion at my disposal, I'd be irresponsible, too. -- Lichty & Wagner
Oh, well, I guess this is just going to be one of those lifetimes.
Oh, wow! Look at the moon!
"OK, now let's look at four dimensions on the blackboard." -- Dr. Joy
OK, so you're a Ph.D. Just don't touch anything.
Old age is the most unexpected of things that can happen to a man. -- Trotsky
Old programmers never die. They just branch to a new address.
Old soldiers never die. Young ones do.
Oliver's Law: Experience is something you don't get until just after you need it.
Omnibiblious, adj.: Indifferent to type of drink. "Oh, you can get me anything. I'm omnibiblious."
On a paper submitted by a physicist colleague:  "This isn't right. This isn't even wrong." -- Wolfgang Pauli
On Monday mornings I am dedicated to the proposition that all men are created jerks. -- Avery
On Monday mornings I am dedicated to the proposition that all men are created jerks. -- H. Allen Smith, "Let the Crabgrass Grow"
On the road, ZIPPY is a pinhead without a purpose, but never without a POINT ...
On-line, adj.: The idea that a human being should always be accessible to a computer.
Once, adv.: Enough. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
One advantage of talking to yourself is that you know at least somebody's listening. -- Franklin P. Jones
One can't proceed from the informal to the formal by formal means.
One difference between a man and a machine is that a machine is quiet when well oiled.
One good reason why computers can do more work than people is that they never have to stop and answer the phone.
One is not superior merely because one sees the world as odious. -- Chateaubriand (1768-1848)
One learns to itch where one can scratch. -- Ernest Bramah
One man's theology is another man's belly laugh.
One nice thing about egotists: they don't talk about other people.
One of the lessons of history is that nothing is often a good thing to do and always a clever thing to say. -- Will Durant
One Page Principle: A specification that will not fit on one page of 8.5x11 inch paper cannot be understood. -- Mark Ardis
"One planet is all you get."
One reason why George Washington Is held in such veneration: He never blamed his problems On the former Administration. -- George O. Ludcke
One seldom sees a monument to a committee.
One thing the inventors can't seem to get the bugs out of is fresh paint.
One way to make your old car run better is to look up the price of a new model.
One way to stop a runaway horse is to bet on him.
One, with God, is always a majority, but many a martyr has been burned at the stake while the votes were being counted. -- Thomas B. Reed
Only adults have difficulty with childproof caps.
Only God can make random selections.
Only presidents, editors, and people with tapeworms have the right to use the editorial "we."
Only through hard work and perseverance can one truly suffer.
Optimization hinders evolution.
Optimization hinders evolution.
Oregano, n.: The ancient Italian art of pizza folding.
Oregon, n.: Eighty billion gallons of water with no place to go on Saturday night.
Organic chemistry is the chemistry of carbon compounds. Biochemistry is the study of carbon compounds that crawl. -- Mike Adams
Osborn's Law: Variables won't; constants aren't.
Others will look to you for stability, so hide when you bite your nails.
Our country has plenty of good five-cent cigars, but the trouble is they charge fifteen cents for them.
Our OS who art in CPU, UNIX be thy name. Thy programs run, thy syscalls done, In kernel as it is in user!
Our policy is, when in doubt, do the right thing. -- Roy L. Ash, ex-president Litton Industries
"Our vision is to speed up time, eventually eliminating it." -- Alex Schure
"Our vision is to speed up time, eventually eliminating it." -- Alex Schure
Ours is a world of nuclear giants and ethical infants. -- General Omar N. Bradley
"Outside of a dog, a book is a man's best friend: and inside a dog, it's too dark to read." -- Groucho Marx
Over the years, I've developed my sense of deja vu so acutely that now I can remember things that *have* happened before ...
Overdrawn? But I still have checks left!
Overflow on /dev/null, please empty the bit bucket.
Overload -- core meltdown sequence initiated.
Painting, n.: The art of protecting flat surfaces from the weather, and exposing them to the critic. -- Ambrose Bierce
panic: can't find /
panic: kernel trap (ignored)
Paradise is exactly like where you are right now ... only much, much better. -- Laurie Anderson
Parallel lines never meet, unless you bend one or both of them.
Paranoia is simply an optimistic outlook on life.
Paranoid schizophrenics outnumber their enemies at least two to one.
Paranoids are people, too; they have their own problems. It's easy to criticize, but if everybody hated you, you'd be paranoid too. -- D. J. Hicks
Pardo's First Postulate: Anything good in life is either illegal, immoral, or fattening.  Arnold's Addendum: Everything else causes cancer in rats.
Pardon this fortune. Database under reconstruction.
Parker's Law: Beauty is only skin deep, but ugly goes clean to the bone.
Parkinson's Fifth Law: If there is a way to delay in important decision, the good bureaucracy, public or private, will find it.
Parkinson's Fourth Law: The number of people in any working group tends to increase regardless of the amount of work to be done.
Parsley is gharsley. -- Ogden Nash
Parts that positively cannot be assembled in improper order will be.
"Pascal is not a high-level language." -- Steven Feiner
"Pascal is Pascal is Pascal is dog meat." -- M. Devine and P. Larson, Computer Science 340
Pascal Users: To show respect for the 313th anniversary (tomorrow) of the death of Blaise Pascal, your programs will be run at half speed.
Pascal, n.: A programming language named after a man who would turn over in his grave if he knew about it.
Passionate hatred can give meaning and purpose to an empty life. -- Eric Hoffer
Patageometry, n.: The study of those mathematical properties that are invariant under brain transplants.
Paul Revere was a tattle-tale
Paul's Law: In America, it's not how much an item costs, it's how much you save.
Paul's Law: You can't fall off the floor.
Peace, n.: In international affairs, a period of cheating between two periods of fighting. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Pecor's Health-Food Principle: Never eat rutabaga on any day of the week that has a "y" in it.
Pedaeration, n.: The perfect body heat achieved by having one leg under the sheet and one hanging off the edge of the bed. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Penguin Trivia #46: Animals who are not penguins can only wish they were. -- Chicago Reader 10/15/82
People need good lies. There are too many bad ones. -- Bokonon, "Cat's Cradle" by Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
People often find it easier to be a result of the past than a cause of the future.
"People think love is an emotion. Love is good sense." -- Ken Kesey
People usually get what's coming to them ... unless it's been mailed.
People who claim they don't let little things bother them have never slept in a room with a single mosquito.
People who have what they want are very fond of telling people who haven't what they want that they don't want it. -- Ogden Nash
People will accept your ideas much more readily if you tell them that Benjamin Franklin said it first.
People will buy anything that's one to a customer.
People will do tomorrow what they did today because that is what they did yesterday.
Pereant, inquit, qui ante nos nostra dixerunt. "Confound those who have said our remarks before us." -- Aelius Donatus
Perfect day for scrubbing the floor and other exciting things.
Perfection is reached, not when there is no longer anything to add, but when there is no longer anything to take away. -- Antoine de Saint-Exupery
Personifiers Unite! You have nothing to lose but Mr. Dignity!
Peter's Law of Substitution: Look after the molehills, and the mountains will look after themselves.
Philadelphia is not dull -- it just seems so because it is next to exciting Camden, New Jersey.
Philogyny recapitulates erogeny; erogeny recapitulates philogyny.
Philosophy will clip an angel's wings. -- John Keats
Pick another fortune cookie.
Pity the meek, for they shall inherit the earth. -- Don Marquis
PL/1, "the fatal disease", belongs more to the problem set than to the solution set. -- E. W. Dijkstra
"Plaese porrf raed." -- Prof. Michael O'Longhlin, S.U.N.Y. Purchase
Play Rogue, visit exotic locations, meet strange creatures and kill them.
Playing an unamplified electric guitar is like strumming on a picnic table. -- Dave Barry, "The Snake"
Please ignore previous fortune.
Please take note:
Please, won't somebody tell me what diddie-wa-diddie means?
Pohl's law: Nothing is so good that somebody, somewhere, will not hate it.
Political T.V. commercials prove one thing: some candidates can tell all their good points and qualifications in just 30 seconds.
Politicians are the same all over. They promise to build a bridge even where there is no river. -- Nikita Khrushchev
Politics is like coaching a football team. you have to be smart enough to understand the game but not smart enough to lose interest.
Polymer physicists are into chains.
Portable, adj.: Survives system reboot.
Positive, adj.: Mistaken at the top of one's voice. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Pound for pound, the amoeba is the most vicious animal on earth.
"Power corrupts. Absolute power is kind of neat" -- John Lehman, Secretary of the Navy 1981-1987
Power corrupts. And atomic power corrupts atomically.
Power, n: The only narcotic regulated by the SEC instead of the FDA.
Practical people would be more practical if they would take a little more time for dreaming. -- J. P. McEvoy
Predestination was doomed from the start.
President Reagan has noted that there are too many economic pundits and forecasters and has decided on an excess prophets tax.
vote. In a democracy, that's not called quitting. -- The Washington Post
Pretend to spank me -- I'm a pseudo-masochist!
Preudhomme's Law of Window Cleaning: It's on the other side.
[Prime Minister Joseph] Chamberlain loves the working man -- he loves to see him work. -- Winston Churchill
Pro is to con as progress is to Congress.
Prof: So the American government went to IBM to come up with a data encryption standard and they came up with ... Student: EBCDIC!"
"Protozoa are small, and bacteria are small, but viruses are smaller than the both put together."
Psychiatrists say that one out of four people are mentally ill. Check three friends. If they're OK, you're it.
Psychotherapy is the theory that the patient will probably get well anyhow and is certainly a damn fool. -- H. L. Mencken
Pure drivel tends to drive ordinary drivel off of the TV screen.
Pure drivel tends to drive ordinary drivel off the TV screen.
Pushing 40 is exercise enough.
Put no trust in cryptic comments.
Put your Nose to the Grindstone! -- Amalgamated Plastic Surgeons and Toolmakers, Ltd.
Q: Do you know what the death rate around here is? A: One per person.
Q: How did you get into artificial intelligence? A: Seemed logical -- I didn't have any real intelligence.
Q: How many DEC repairman does it take to fix a flat ? A: Five; four to hold the car up and one to swap tires.
Q: How many heterosexual males does it take to screw in a light bulb in San Francisco? A: Both of them.
Q: How many IBM cpu's does it take to do a logical right shift? A: 33. 1 to hold the bits and 32 to push the register.
Q: How many IBM CPU's does it take to execute a job? A: Four; three to hold it down, and one to rip its head off.
Q: How many IBM types does it take to change a light bulb? A: 100. Ten to do it, and 90 to write document number GC7500439-0001,
of the definitions are of the form "A ...... consists of sequences of non-blank characters separated by blanks".
Q: How many Martians does it take to screw in a lightbulb? A: One and a half.
Q: How many Zen masters does it take to screw in a light bulb? A: None. The Universe spins the bulb, and the Zen master stays out of the way.
Q: What's a light-year? A: One-third less calories than a regular year.
Q: Why did the tachyon cross the road? A: Because it was on the other side.
Q: Why do ducks have flat feet? A: To stamp out forest fires.  Q: Why do elephants have flat feet? A: To stamp out flaming ducks.
Q: Why do mountain climbers rope themselves together? A: To prevent the sensible ones from going home.
Quality Control, n.: The process of testing one out of every 1,000 units coming off a production line to make sure that at least one out of 100 works.
Question: Man Invented Alcohol, God Invented Grass. Who do you trust?
Quick!! Act as if nothing has happened!
Quick, sing me the BUDAPEST NATIONAL ANTHEM!!
Quidquid latine dictum sit, altum viditur.  (Whatever is said in Latin sounds profound.)
Quigley's Law: Whoever has any authority over you, no matter how small, will atttempt to use it.
QUOTE OF THE DAY:  ` 
"Qvid me anxivs svm?"
Radioactive cats have 18 half-lives.
Ray's Rule of Precision: Measure with a micrometer. Mark with chalk. Cut with an axe.
Reader, suppose you were an idiot. And suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself. -- Mark Twain
Real computer scientists don't comment their code. The identifiers are so long they can't afford the disk space.
Real computer scientists don't program in assembler. They don't write in anything less portable than a number two pencil.
Real programmers don't bring brown-bag lunches. If the vending machine doesn't sell it, they don't eat it. Vending machines don't sell quiche.
Real programmers don't comment their code. It was hard to write, it should be hard to understand.
Real programmers don't write in BASIC. Actually, no programmers write in BASIC after reaching puberty.
Real Programmers don't write in PL/I. PL/I is for programmers who can't decide whether to write in COBOL or FORTRAN.
Real Programmers think better when playing Adventure or Rogue.
Real Programs don't use shared text. Otherwise, how can they use functions for scratch space after they are finished calling them?
Real Time, adj.: Here and now, as opposed to fake time, which only occurs there and then.
Real Users are afraid they'll break the machine -- but they're never afraid to break your face.
Real Users find the one combination of bizarre input values that shuts down the system for days.
Real Users hate Real Programmers.
Real Users know your home telephone number.
Real Users never know what they want, but they always know when your program doesn't deliver it.
Real Users never use the Help key.
Reality is a cop-out for people who can't handle drugs.
Reality is an obstacle to hallucination.
Reality is bad enough, why should I tell the truth? -- Patrick Sky
Reality is for people who lack imagination.
Reality is for those who can't face Science Fiction.
Reality is just a convenient measure of complexity. -- Alvy Ray Smith
"Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn't go away". -- Philip K. Dick
"Really ?? What a coincidence, I'm shallow too!!"
"Reflections on Ice-Breaking" Candy Is dandy But liquor Is quicker. -- Ogden Nash
Reisner's Rule of Conceptual Inertia: If you think big enough, you'll never have to do it.
Religion has done love a great service by making it a sin. -- Anatole France
"Rembrandt's first name was Beauregard, which is why he never used it." -- Dave Barry
Remember that whatever misfortune may be your lot, it could only be worse in Cleveland. -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
Remember, drive defensively! And of course, the best defense is a good offense!
Remember, even if you win the rat race -- you're still a rat.
Remember, UNIX spelled backwards is XINU.
Remember: Silly is a state of Mind, Stupid is a way of Life. -- Dave Butler
Renning's Maxim: Man is the highest animal. Man does the classifying.
Reporter (to Mahatma Gandhi): Mr Gandhi, what do you think of Western Civilization? Gandhi: I think it would be a good idea.
Reporter, n.: A writer who guesses his way to the truth and dispels it with a tempest of words. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Research is what I'm doing when I don't know what I'm doing. -- Wernher von Braun
Resisting temptation is easier when you think you'll probably get another chance later on.
"Right now I'm having amnesia and deja vu at the same time." -- Steven Wright
Rocky's Lemma of Innovation Prevention Unless the results are known in advance, funding agencies will reject the proposal.
Romeo wasn't bilked in a day. -- Walt Kelly, "Ten Ever-Lovin' Blue-Eyed Years With Pogo"
ROMEO: Courage, man; the hurt cannot be much. MERCUTIO: No, 'tis not so deep as a well, nor so wide as a church- door; but 'tis enough, 'twill serve.
Rudin's Law: If there is a wrong way to do something, most people will do it every time.
Rule of Creative Research: (1) Never draw what you can copy. (2) Never copy what you can trace. (3) Never trace what you can cut out and paste down.
Rule of Defactualization: Information deteriorates upward through bureaucracies.
Rule of the Great: When people you greatly admire appear to be thinking deep thoughts, they probably are thinking about lunch.
Rules for Academic Deans: (1) HIDE!!!! (2) If they find you, LIE!!!! -- Father Damian C. Fandal
Rules: (1) The boss is always right. (2) When the boss is wrong, refer to rule 1.
San Francisco isn't what it used to be, and it never was. -- Herb Caen
San Francisco, n.: Marcel Proust editing an issue of Penthouse.
Sanity is the trademark of a weak mind. -- Mark Harrold
Satellite Safety Tip #14: If you see a bright streak in the sky coming at you, duck.
Sattinger's Law: It works better if you plug it in.
Sauron is alive in Argentina!
Save energy: be apathetic.
Save the Whales -- Harpoon a Honda.
Save the whales. Collect the whole set.
"Saw a sign on a restaurant that said Breakfast, any time -- so I ordered French Toast in the Renaissance. -- Steven Wright
SCCS, the source motel! Programs check in and never check out! -- Ken Thompson
Schapiro's Explanation: The grass is always greener on the other side -- but that's because they use more manure.
Schizophrenia beats being alone.
Schnuffel, n.: A dog's practice of continuously nuzzling in your crotch in mixed company. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Schwiggle, n.: The amusing rotation of one's bottom while sharpening a pencil. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Science is what happens when preconception meets verification.
Scientists are people who build the Brooklyn Bridge and then buy it. -- William Buckley 
Scott's first Law: No matter what goes wrong, it will probably look right.
Screw up your courage! You've screwed up everything else.
Scrubbing floors and emptying bedpans has as much dignity as the Presidency. -- Richard Nixon
Security check: INTRUDER ALERT!
"See - the thing is - I'm an absolutist. I mean, kind of ... in a way ..."
Seleznick's Theory of Holistic Medicine: Ice Cream cures all ills.
Self Test for Paranoia: You know you have it when you can't think of anything that's your own fault.
Seminars, n.: From "semi" and "arse", hence, any half-assed discussion.
Senate, n.: A body of elderly gentlemen charged with high duties and misdemeanors. -- Ambrose Bierce
Serenity through viciousness.
Serocki's Stricture: Marriage is always a bachelor's last option.
Serving coffee on aircraft causes turbulence.
Sex is a natural bodily process, like a stroke.
Sex is not the answer. Sex is the question. "Yes" is the answer. -- Swami X
Sex is the mathematics urge sublimated. -- M. C. Reed.
Sex without love is an empty experience, but, as empty experiences go, it's one of the best. -- Woody Allen
Shaw's Principle: Build a system that even a fool can use, and only a fool will want to use it.
"She is descended from a long line that her mother listened to." -- Gypsy Rose Lee
She is not refined. She is not unrefined. She keeps a parrot. -- Mark Twain
She liked him; he was a man of many qualities, even if most of them were bad.
She missed an invaluable opportunity to give him a look that you could have poured on a waffle ...
"She said, `I know you ... you cannot sing'. I said, `That's nothing, you should hear me play piano.'" -- Morrisey
She's genuinely bogus.
SHIFT TO THE LEFT! SHIFT TO THE RIGHT! POP UP, PUSH DOWN, BYTE, BYTE, BYTE!
Show me a man who is a good loser and I'll show you a man who is playing golf with his boss.
Show respect for age. Drink good Scotch for a change.
Signs of crime: screaming or cries for help. -- from the Brown Security Crime Prevention Pamphlet
Silverman's Law: If Murphy's Law can go wrong, it will.
Simon's Law: Everything put together falls apart sooner or later.
Since we have to speak well of the dead, let's knock them while they're alive. -- John Sloan
Since we're all here, we must not be all there. -- Bob "Mountain" Beck
[Sir Stafford Cripps] has all the virtues I dislike and none of the vices I admire. -- Winston Churchill
Slang is language that takes off its coat, spits on its hands, and goes to work.
Slowly and surely the unix crept up on the Nintendo user ...
Slurm, n.: The slime that accumulates on the underside of a soap bar when it sits in the dish too long. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Smoking is one of the leading causes of statistics. -- Fletcher Knebel
Smoking is one of the leading causes of statistics. -- Fletcher Knebel
So far as I can remember, there is not one word in the Gospels in praise of intelligence. -- Bertrand Russell
So, what's with this guy Gideon, anyway? And why can't he ever remember his Bible?
Sodd's Second Law: Sooner or later, the worst possible set of circumstances is bound to occur.
Software, n.: Formal evening attire for female computer analysts.
Some don't prefer the pursuit of happiness to the happiness of pursuit.
Some men are alive simply because it is against the law to kill them. -- Ed Howe
Some people are born mediocre, some people achieve mediocrity, and some people have mediocrity thrust upon them. -- Joseph Heller, "Catch-22"
Some people have a way about them that seems to say: "If I have only one life to live, let me live it as a jerk."
Some people in this department wouldn't recognize subtlety if it hit them on the head.
Some people live life in the fast lane. You're in oncoming traffic.
Some performers on television appear to be horrible people, but when you finally get to know them in person, they turn out to be even worse. -- Avery
Some programming languages manage to absorb change but withstand progress.
Some programming languages manage to absorb change, but withstand progress. -- Epigrams in Programming, ACM SIGPLAN Sept. 1982
Somebody ought to cross ball point pens with coat hangers so that the pens will multiply instead of disappear.
Someone will try to honk your nose today.
"Sometimes I simply feel that the whole world is a cigarette and I'm the only ashtray."
Sometimes I worry about being a success in a mediocre world. -- Lily Tomlin
Somewhere, just out of sight, the unicorns are gathering.
Song Title of the Week: "They're putting dimes in the hole in my head to see the change in me."
Sooner or later you must pay for your sins. (Those who have already paid may disregard this fortune).
Sorry, no fortune this time.
Sorry. I forget what I was going to say.
"Spare no expense to save money on this one." -- Samuel Goldwyn
Speak softly and carry a +6 two-handed sword.
Speak softly and own a big, mean Doberman. -- Dave Millman
"Speed is subsittute fo accurancy."
Speer's 1st Law of Proofreading: The visibility of an error is inversely proportional to the number of times you have looked at it.
Spelling is a lossed art.
Spend extra time on hobby. Get plenty of rolling papers.
Spirtle, n.: The fine stream from a grapefruit that always lands right in your eye. -- Sniglets, "Rich Hall & Friends"
Spouse, n.: Someone who'll stand by you through all the trouble you wouldn't have had if you'd stayed single.
Stay away from flying saucers today.
Stay away from hurricanes for a while.
"Stealing a rhinoceros should not be attempted lightly."
Steele's Plagiarism of Somebody's Philosophy: Everybody should believe in something -- I believe I'll have another drink.
Steinbach's Guideline for Systems Programming: Never test for an error condition you don't know how to handle.
Stop searching. Happiness is right next to you.
Stop searching. Happiness is right next to you. Now, if they'd only take a bath ...
Stult's Report: Our problems are mostly behind us. What we have to do now is fight the solutions.
Stupid, n.: Losing $25 on the game and $25 on the instant replay.
Stupidity got us into this mess -- why can't it get us out?
Sturgeon's Law:
Substitute "damn" every time you're inclined to write "very"; your editor will delete it and the writing will be just as it should be. -- Mark Twain
Subtlety is the art of saying what you think and getting out of the way before it is understood.
Succumb to natural tendencies. Be hateful and boring.
Suddenly, Professor Liebowitz realizes he has come to the seminar without his duck ...
Support bacteria -- it's the only culture some people have!
Support wildlife -- vote for an orgy.
Support your local police force -- steal!!
Support your local Search and Rescue unit -- get lost.
Sure he's sharp as a razor ... he's a two-dimensional pinhead!
Surprise due today. Also the rent.
Surprise your boss. Get to work on time.
Swahili, n.: The language used by the National Enquirer to print their retractions. -- Johnny Hart
Sweater, n.: A garment worn by a child when its mother feels chilly.
Swipple's Rule of Order: He who shouts the loudest has the floor.
Syntactic sugar causes cancer of the semicolon. -- Epigrams in Programming, ACM SIGPLAN Sept. 1982
Tact is the ability to tell a man he has an open mind when he has a hole in his head.
Tact, n.: The unsaid part of what you're thinking.
Take everything in stride. Trample anyone who gets in your way.
Take heart amid the deepening gloom that your dog is finally getting enough cheese -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
Take it easy, we're in a hurry.
Take my word for it, the silliest woman can manage a clever man, but it needs a very clever woman to manage a fool. -- Kipling
Talk sense to a fool and he calls you foolish. -- Euripides
Talkers are no good doers. -- William Shakespeare, "Henry VI"
Talking much about oneself can also be a means to conceal oneself. -- Friedrich Nietzsche
Tax reform means "Don't tax you, don't tax me, tax that fellow behind the tree." -- Russell Long
Taxes are going up so fast, the government is likely to price itself out of the market.
Taxes, n.: Of life's two certainties, the only one for which you can get an extension.
Teach children to be polite and courteous in the home, and, when he grows up, he will never be able to edge his car onto a freeway.
Teamwork is essential -- it allows you to blame someone else.
Technological progress has merely provided us with more efficient means for going backwards. -- Aldous Huxley
Telephone, n.: An invention of the devil which abrogates some of the advantages of making a disagreeable person keep his distance. -- Ambrose Bierce
Tell me, O Octopus, I begs, Is those things arms, or is they legs? I marvel at thee, Octopus; If I were thou, I'd call me us. -- Ogden Nash
Ten years of rejection slips is nature's way of telling you to stop writing. -- R. Geis
Test-tube babies shouldn't throw stones.
Texas law forbids anyone to have a pair of pliers in his possession.
"Text processing has made it possible to right-justify any idea, even one which cannot be justified on any other grounds." -- J. Finnegan, USC.
Thank goodness modern convenience is a thing of the remote future. -- Pogo, by Walt Kelly
"That boy's about as sharp as a pound of wet liver" -- Foghorn Leghorn
"That must be wonderful! I don't understand it at all."
That secret you've been guarding, isn't.
That woman speaks eight languages and can't say "no" in any of them. -- Dorothy Parker
The 80's -- when you can't tell hairstyles from chemotherapy.
The [Ford Foundation] is a large body of money completely surrounded by people who want some. -- Dwight MacDonald
The Abrams' Principle: The shortest distance between two points is off the wall.
The advertisement is the most truthful part of a newspaper -- Thomas Jefferson
"The algorithm to do that is extremely nasty. You might want to mug someone with it." -- M. Devine, Computer Science 340
The Arkansas legislature passed a law that states that the Arkansas River can rise no higher than to the Main Street bridge in Little Rock.
The Army needs leaders the way a foot needs a big toe. -- Bill Murray
The average income of the modern teenager is about 2 a.m.
The average woman would rather have beauty than brains, because the average man can see better than he can think.
The best book on programming for the layman is "Alice in Wonderland"; but that's because it's the best book on anything for the layman.
The best cure for insomnia is to get a lot of sleep. -- W. C. Fields
The best defense against logic is ignorance.
The best thing about growing older is that it takes such a long time.
The best way to make a fire with two sticks is to make sure one of them is a match. -- Will Rogers
The bigger the theory the better.
The biggest difference between time and space is that you can't reuse time. -- Merrick Furst
"The bland leadeth the bland and they both shall fall into the kitsch."
The bogosity meter just pegged.
The brain is a wonderful organ; it starts working the moment you get up in the morning, and does not stop until you get to school.
The bureaucracy is expanding to meet the needs of an expanding bureaucracy.
"The C Programming Language -- A language which combines the flexibility of assembly language with the power of assembly language."
The camel has a single hump; The dromedary two; Or else the other way around. I'm never sure. Are you? -- Ogden Nash
"The chain which can be yanked is not the eternal chain." -- G. Fitch
The chicken that clucks the loudest is the one most likely to show up at the steam fitters' picnic.
The chief cause of problems is solutions.
The chief danger in life is that you may take too may precautions. -- Alfred Adler
The church is near but the road is icy; the bar is far away but I will walk carefully. -- Russian Proverb
"The climate of Bombay is such that its inhabitants have to live elsewhere."
"The Computer made me do it."
The computing field is always in need of new cliches. -- Alan Perlis
The confusion of a staff member is measured by the length of his memos. -- New York Times, Jan. 20, 1981
The cost of living hasn't affected its popularity.
The cost of living is going up, and the chance of living is going down.
The cow is nothing but a machine with makes grass fit for us people to eat. -- John McNulty
The Crown is full of it! -- Nate Harris, 1775
The day after tomorrow is the third day of the rest of your life.
The debate rages on: Is PL/I Bachtrian or Dromedary?
The devil finds work for idle circuits to do.
The District of Columbia has a law forbidding you to exert pressure on a balloon and thereby cause a whistling sound on the streets.
The doctrine of human equality reposes on this: that there is no man really clever who has not found that he is stupid. -- Gilbert K. Chesterson
The early bird who catches the worm works for someone who comes in late and owns the worm farm. -- Travis McGee
The earth is like a tiny grain of sand, only much, much heavier.
The easiest way to figure the cost of living is to take your income and add ten percent.
The economy depends about as much on economists as the weather does on weather forecasters. -- Jean-Paul Kauffmann
"The eleventh commandment was `Thou Shalt Compute' or `Thou Shalt Not Compute' -- I forget which." -- Epigrams in Programming, ACM SIGPLAN Sept. 1982
The end of the human race will be that it will eventually die of civilization. -- Ralph Waldo Emerson
The end of the world will occur at 3:00 p.m., this Friday, with symposium to follow.
The English have no respect for their language, and will not teach their children to speak it. -- G. B. Shaw
The fact that boys are allowed to exist at all is evidence of a remarkable Christian forbearance among men. -- Ambrose Bierce
The fact that it works is immaterial. -- L. Ogborn
The faster we go, the rounder we get. -- The Grateful Dead
The Fifth Rule: You have taken yourself too seriously.
The first duty of a revolutionary is to get away with it. -- Abbie Hoffman
The first myth of management is that it exists. The second myth of management is that success equals skill. -- Robert Heller
"The first rule of magic is simple. Don't waste your time waving your hands and hoping when a rock or a club will do." -- McCloctnik the Lucid
The First Rule of Program Optimization: Don't do it.  The Second Rule of Program Optimization (for experts only!): Don't do it yet. -- Michael Jackson
The first time, it's a KLUDGE! The second, a trick. Later, it's a well-established technique! -- Mike Broido, Intermetrics
The fortune program is supported, in part, by user contributions and by a major grant from the National Endowment for the Inanities.
"The four building blocks of the universe are fire, water, gravel and vinyl." -- Dave Barry
The full impact of parenthood doesn't hit you until you multiply the number of your kids by 32 teeth.
The generation of random numbers is too important to be left to chance.
The gentlemen looked one another over with microscopic carelessness.
The giraffe you thought you offended last week is willing to be nuzzled today.
The goal of Computer Science is to build something that will last at least until we've finished building it.
The goal of science is to build better mousetraps. The goal of nature is to build better mice.
The gods gave man fire and he invented fire engines. They gave him love and he invented marriage.
THE GOLDEN RULE OF ARTS AND SCIENCES The one who has the gold makes the rules.
The good die young -- because they see it's no use living if you've got to be good.
The greatest dangers to liberty lurk in insidious encroachment by men of zeal, well-meaning but without understanding. -- Justice Louis D. Brandeis
The hardest thing in the world to understand is the income tax. -- Albert Einstein
The hearing ear is always found close to the speaking tongue, a custom whereof the memory of man runneth not howsomever to the contrary, nohow.
The Heineken Uncertainty Principle: You can never be sure how many beers you had last night.
The herd instinct among economists makes sheep look like independent thinkers.
The human animal differs from the lesser primates in his passion for lists of "Ten Best". -- H. Allen Smith
"The human brain is like an enormous fish -- it is flat and slimy and has gills through which it can see." -- Monty Python
The human mind ordinarily operates at only ten percent of its capacity -- the rest is overhead for the operating system.
The human mind treats a new idea the way the body treats a strange protein -- it rejects it. -- P. Medawar
The human race has one really effective weapon, and that is laughter. -- Mark Twain
The human race is a race of cowards; and I am not only marching in that procession but carrying a banner. -- Mark Twain
The idea is to die young as late as possible. -- Ashley Montagu
The idea is to die young as late as possible. -- Ashley Montague
"The identical is equal to itself, since it is different." -- Franco Spisani
"The illegal we do immediately. The unconstitutional takes a bit longer." -- Henry Kissinger
The intelligence of any discussion diminishes with the square of the number of participants. -- Adam Walinsky
The IQ of the group is the lowest IQ of a member of the group divided by the number of people in the group.
The Kennedy Constant: Don't get mad -- get even.
The Killer Ducks are coming!!!
The law will never make men free; it is men who have got to make the law free. -- Henry David Thoreau
The light at the end of the tunnel is the headlight of an approaching train.
The light at the end of the tunnel may be an oncoming dragon.
The lion and the calf shall lie down together but the calf won't get much sleep. -- Woody Allen
The longer I am out of office, the more infallible I appear to myself. -- Henry Kissinger
"The Lord gave us farmers two strong hands so we could grab as much as we could with both of them." -- Joseph Heller, "Catch-22"
The makers may make and the users may use, but the fixers must fix with but minimal clues
The man who sets out to carry a cat by its tail learns something that will always be useful and which never will grow dim or doubtful. -- Mark Twain.
"... the Mayo Clinic, named after its founder, Dr. Ted Clinic ..." -- Dave Barry
The meek shall inherit the earth -- they are too weak to refuse.
The meta-Turing test counts a thing as intelligent if it seeks to devise and apply Turing tests to objects of its own creation. -- Lew Mammel, Jr.
The modern child will answer you back before you've said anything. -- Laurence J. Peter
The mome rath isn't born that could outgrabe me. -- Nicol Williamson
The moon is a planet just like the Earth, only it is even deader.
The moon may be smaller than Earth, but it's further away.
"The more data I punch in this card, the lighter it becomes, and the lower the mailing cost." -- Stan Kelly-Bootle, "The Devil's DP Dictionary"
The more laws and order are made prominent, the more thieves and robbers there will be. -- Lao Tsu
The more things change, the more they stay insane.
The more we disagree, the more chance there is that at least one of us is right.
The mosquito is the state bird of New Jersey. -- Andy Warhol
"The most difficult thing in the world is to know how to do a thing and to watch someone else do it wrong without comment." -- Theodore H. White
The moving cursor writes, and having written, blinks on.
... the MYSTERIANS are in here with my CORDUROY SOAP DISH!!
"The National Association of Theater Concessionaires reported that in
-- D. Letterman
The National Short-Sleeved Shirt Association says: Support your right to bare arms!
The new Congressmen say they're going to turn the government around. I hope I don't get run over again.
The nice thing about standards is that there are so many of them to choose from. -- Andrew S. Tanenbaum
The notion of a "record" is an obsolete remnant of the days of the 80-column card. -- Dennis M. Ritchie
The number of arguments is unimportant unless some of them are correct. -- Ralph Hartley
The older a man gets, the farther he had to walk to school as a boy.
The older I grow the more I distrust the familiar doctrine that age brings wisdom. -- H. L. Mencken
The older I grow, the less important the comma becomes. Let the reader catch his own breath. -- Elizabeth Clarkson Zwart
The one good thing about repeating your mistakes is that you know when to cringe.
The only possible interpretation of any research whatever in the `social sciences' is: some do, some don't. -- Ernest Rutherford
The only problem with being a man of leisure is that you can never stop and take a rest.
"The only real way to look younger is not to be born so soon." -- Charles Schulz, "Things I've Had to Learn Over and Over and Over"
The only really decent thing to do behind a person's back is pat it.
The only thing to do with good advice is pass it on. It is never any use to oneself. -- Oscar Wilde
The only way to get rid of a temptation is to yield to it. -- Oscar Wilde
The opossum is a very sophisticated animal. It doesn't even get up until 5 or 6 p.m.
The opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth. -- Bohr
The optimum committee has no members. -- Norman Augustine
The optimum committee has no members. -- Norman Augustine
"The other day I put instant coffee in my microwave oven ... I almost went back in time." -- Steven Wright
The past always looks better than it was. It's only pleasant because it isn't here. -- Finley Peter Dunne (Mr. Dooley)
The Pig, if I am not mistaken, Gives us ham and pork and Bacon. Let others think his heart is big, I think it stupid of the Pig. -- Ogden Nash
The plot was designed in a light vein that somehow became varicose. -- David Lardner
"The porcupine with the sharpest quills gets stuck on a tree more often."
The price of seeking to force our beliefs on others is that someday they might force their beliefs on us. -- Mario Cuomo
The primary requisite for any new tax law is for it to exempt enough voters to win the next election.
The probability of someone watching you is proportional to the stupidity of your action.
The problem with any unwritten law is that you don't know where to go to erase it. -- Glaser and Way
The problem with the gene pool is that there is no lifeguard.
The qotc (quote of the con) was Liz's: "My brain is paged out to my liver"
The rain it raineth on the just And also on the unjust fella, But chiefly on the just, because The unjust steals the just's umbrella.
The reader this message encounters not failing to understand is cursed.
The reason computer chips are so small is computers don't eat much.
The revolution will not be televised.
The reward of a thing well done is to have done it. -- Emerson
The right half of the brain controls the left half of the body. This means that only left handed people are in their right mind.
"The Right Honorable Gentleman is indebted to his memory for his jests and to his imagination for his facts." -- Sheridan
The right to revolt has sources deep in our history. -- Supreme Court Justice William O. Douglas
The road to hell is paved with good intentions. And littered with sloppy analysis!
The Roman Rule The one who says it cannot be done should never interrupt the one who is doing it.
The rule on staying alive as a forcaster is to give 'em a number or give 'em a date, but never give 'em both at once. -- Jane Bryant Quinn
"The Schizophrenic: An Unauthorized Autobiography"
The scum also rises. -- Dr. Hunter S. Thompson
The sheep that fly over your head are soon to land.
The shortest distance between two points is under construction. -- Noelie Alito
"The sooner all the animals are dead, the sooner we'll find their money." -- Ed Bluestone, "The National Lampoon"
"The sooner you fall behind, the more time you'll have to catch up!"
The sooner you make your first 5000 mistakes, the sooner you will be able to correct them. -- Nicolaides
The soul would have no rainbow had the eyes no tears.
The state law of Pennsylvania prohibits singing in the bathtub.
The steady state of disks is full. -- Ken Thompson
The streets are safe in Philadelphia, it's only the people who make them unsafe. -- Mayor Frank Rizzo
"The student in question is performing minimally for his peer group and is an emerging underachiever."
The study of non-linear physics is like the study of non-elephant biology.
"The subspace _W inherits the other 8 properties of _V. And there aren't even any property taxes." -- J. MacKay, Mathematics 134b
The sum of the Universe is zero.
The superfluous is very necessary. -- Voltaire
The surest protection against temptation is cowardice. -- Mark Twain
The trouble with a kitten is that When it grows up, it's always a cat -- Ogden Nash.
The trouble with being poor is that it takes up all your time.
The trouble with being punctual is that nobody's there to appreciate it. -- Franklin P. Jones
The trouble with being punctual is that people think you have nothing more important to do.
The trouble with doing something right the first time is that nobody appreciates how difficult it was.
The trouble with superheros is what to do between phone booths. -- Ken Kesey
The truth is what is; what should be is a dirty lie. -- Lenny Bruce
The truth of a proposition has nothing to do with its credibility. And vice versa.
The turtle lives 'twixt plated decks Which practically conceal its sex. I think it clever of the turtle In such a fix to be so fertile. -- Ogden Nash
"The two most common things in the universe are hydrogen and stupidity."
The typewriting machine, when played with expression, is no more annoying than the piano when played by a sister or near relation. -- Oscar Wilde
The United States also has its native Fascists who say that they are "100 percent American"... -- U. S. Army (1945)
The United States is like the guy at the party who gives cocaine to everybody and still nobody likes him. -- Jim Samuels
The universe does not have laws -- it has habits, and habits can be broken.
The universe is like a safe to which there is a combination -- but the combination is locked up in the safe. -- Peter DeVries
The use of COBOL cripples the mind; its teaching should, therefore, be regarded as a criminal offense. -- E. W. Dijkstra
The verdict of a jury is the a priori opinion of that juror who smokes the worst cigars. -- H. L. Mencken
The very ink with which all history is written is merely fluid prejudice. -- Mark Twain
"The voters have spoken, the bastards ..."
"The wages of sin are death; but after they're done taking out taxes, it's just a tired feeling:"
The wages of sin are high but you get your money's worth.
"The warning message we sent the Russians was a calculated ambiguity that would be clearly understood." -- Alexander Haig
"The way to make a small fortune in the commodities market is to start with a large fortune."
The world is coming to an end ... SAVE YOUR BUFFERS!!!
The world is coming to an end! Repent and return those library books!
The world is coming to an end. Please log off.
The world's as ugly as sin, And almost as delightful -- Frederick Locker-Lampson
There *__is* intelligent life on Earth, but I leave for Texas on Monday.
There are four kinds of homicide: felonious, excusable, justifiable, and praiseworthy ... -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
There are many intelligent species in the universe. They all own cats.
There are no data that cannot be plotted on a straight line if the axis are chosen correctly.
There are no games on this system.
There are people so addicted to exaggeration that they can't tell the truth without lying.
There are really not many jobs that actually require a penis or a vagina, and all other occupations should be open to everyone. -- Gloria Steinem
There are three kinds of lies: Lies, Damn Lies, and Statistics. -- Disraeli
There are three things I always forget. Names, faces -- the third I can't remember. -- Italo Svevo
There are three ways to get something done: (1) Do it yourself. (2) Hire someone to do it for you. (3) Forbid your kids to do it.
There are three ways to get something done: do it yourself, hire someone, or forbid your kids to do it.
There are times when truth is stranger than fiction and lunch time is one of them.
There are two types of people in this world, good and bad. The good sleep better, but the bad seem to enjoy the waking hours much more. -- Woody Allen
"There are two ways of disliking poetry; one way is to dislike it, the other is to read Pope." -- Oscar Wilde
There are two ways to write error-free programs. Only the third one works.
There are very few personal problems that cannot be solved through a suitable application of high explosives.
There can be no twisted thought without a twisted molecule. -- R. W. Gerard
There cannot be a crisis next week. My schedule is already full. -- Henry Kissinger
There exist tasks which cannot be done by more than 10 men or fewer than 100. -- Steele's Law
There has been an alarming increase in the number of things you know nothing about.
There is a certain impertinence in allowing oneself to be burned for an opinion. -- Anatole France
There is a great discovery still to be made in Literature: that of paying literary men by the quantity they do NOT write.
There is a green, multi-legged creature crawling on your shoulder.
There is a Massachusetts law requiring all dogs to have their hind legs tied during the month of April.
There is a natural hootchy-kootchy to a goldfish. -- Walt Disney
"There is hopeful symbolism in the fact that flags do not wave in a vacuum." -- Arthur C. Clarke
There is no distinctly native American criminal class except Congress. -- Mark Twain
"There is no reason for any individual to have a computer in their home." -- Ken Olson, President of DEC, World Future Society Convention, 1977
There is no satisfaction in hanging a man who does not object to it -- G. B. Shaw
There is no substitute for good manners, except, perhaps, fast reflexes.
There is no such thing as fortune. Try again.
There is no time like the pleasant.
There is no time like the present for postponing what you ought to be doing.
There is no TRUTH. There is no REALITY. There is no CONSISTENCY. There are no ABSOLUTE STATEMENTS I'm very probably wrong.
There is nothing wrong with Southern California that a rise in the ocean level wouldn't cure. -- Ross MacDonald
There is only one thing in the world worse than being talked about, and that is not being talked about. -- Oscar Wilde
There is something fascinating about science. One gets such wholesale returns of conjecture out of such a trifling investment of fact. -- Mark Twain
There once was a girl named Irene Who lived on distilled kerosene But she started absorbin' A new hydrocarbon And since then has never benzene.
"There was a boy called Eustace Clarence Scrubb, and he almost deserved it." -- C. S. Lewis, The Chronicles of Narnia
There was a young lady from Hyde Who ate a green apple and died. While her lover lamented The apple fermented And made cider inside her inside.
There was a young poet named Dan, Whose poetry never would scan. When told this was so, He said, "Yes, I know.
There's a fine line between courage and foolishness. Too bad it's not a fence.
There's an old proverb that says just about whatever you want it to.
There's no easy quick way out, we're gonna have to live through our whole lives, win, lose, or draw. -- Walt Kelly
There's no future in time travel
There's no point in being grown up if you can't be childish sometimes. -- Dr. Who
There's no real need to do housework -- after four years it doesn't get any worse.
There's no room in the drug world for amateurs.
There's no trick to being a humorist when you have the whole government working for you. -- Will Rodgers
"There's nothing in the middle of the road but a yellow stripe and dead armadillos." -- Jim Hightower, Texas Agricultural Commissioner
"There's nothing wrong with teenagers that reasoning with them won't aggravate."
There's only one way to have a happy marriage and as soon as I learn what it is I'll get married again. -- Clint Eastwood
There's so much plastic in this culture that vinyl leopard skin is becoming an endangered synthetic. -- Lily Tomlin
These days the necessities of life cost you about three times what they used to, and half the time they aren't even fit to drink.
They also surf who only stand on waves.
"They make a desert and call it peace." -- Tacitus (55?-120?)
They spell it "da Vinci" and pronounce it "da Vinchy". Foreigners always spell better than they pronounce. -- Mark Twain
"They that can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety." -- Benjamin Franklin, 1759
"They told me I was gullible ... and I believed them!"
They're only trying to make me LOOK paranoid!
"They're unfriendly, which is fortunate, really. They'd be difficult to like." -- Avon
Things are more like they used to be than they are now.
Things will be bright in P.M. A cop will shine a light in your face.
Think big. Pollute the Mississippi.
Think honk if you're a telepath.
Think of it! With VLSI we can pack 100 ENIACs in 1 sq. cm.!
Think of your family tonight. Try to crawl home after the computer crashes.
Think twice before speaking, but don't say "think think click click".
"Thirty days hath Septober, April, June, and no wonder. all the rest have peanut butter except my father who wears red suspenders."
This Fortue Examined By INSPECTOR NO. 2-14
This fortune intentionally not included.
This fortune is false.
This fortune is inoperative. Please try another.
"This is a country where people are free to practice their religion, regardless of race, creed, color, obesity, or number of dangling keys ..."
"This is a job for BOB VIOLENCE and SCUM, the INCREDIBLY STUPID MUTANT DOG." -- Bob Violence
"This is a test of the Emergency Broadcast System. If this had been an actual emergency, do you really think we'd stick around to tell you?"
This is an unauthorized cybernetic announcement.
This is for all ill-treated fellows Unborn and unbegot, For them to read when they're in trouble And I am not. -- A. E. Housman
"This is lemma 1.1. We start a new chapter so the numbers all go back to one." -- Prof. Seager, C&O 351
This is National Non-Dairy Creamer Week.
This is the ____LAST time I take travel suggestions from Ray Bradbury!
This is your fortune.
This land is full of trousers! this land is full of mausers! And pussycats to eat them when the sun goes down! -- Firesign Theater
This life is a test. It is only a test. Had this been an actual life, you would have received further instructions as to what to do and where to go.
This login session: $13.99, but for you $11.88
This novel is not to be tossed lightly aside, but to be hurled with great force. -- Dorothy Parker
"This process can check if this value is zero, and if it is, it does something child-like." -- Forbes Burkowski, Computer Science 454
This sentence contradicts itself -- no actually it doesn't. -- Hofstadter
This will be a memorable month -- no matter how hard you try to forget it.
Those of you who think you know everything are very annoying to those of us who do.
Those who can't write, write manuals.
Those who can, do. Those who can't, simulate.
"Those who do not do politics will be done in by politics." -- French Proverb
Those who do not understand Unix are condemned to reinvent it, poorly. -- Henry Spencer
Those who educate children well are more to be honored than parents, for these only gave life, those the art of living well. -- Aristotle
Those who in quarrels interpose, must often wipe a bloody nose.
Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable. -- John F. Kennedy
Time flies like an arrow Fruit flies like a banana
Time flies like an arrow, but fruit flies like a banana.
Time is an illusion; lunchtime, doubly so. -- Ford Prefect
Time is nature's way of making sure that everything doesn't happen at once.
'Tis the dream of each programmer, Before his life is done, To write three lines of APL, And make the damn things run.
To be intoxicated is to feel sophisticated but not be able to say it.
To be is to do. -- I. Kant To do is to be. -- A. Sartre Yabba-Dabba-Doo! -- F. Flinstone
To be sure of hitting the target, shoot first and, whatever you hit, call it the target.
To err is human, to forgive is Not Company Policy.
"To err is human, to forgive, beyond the scope of the Operating System"
To err is human, to moo bovine.
To every Ph.D. there is an equal and opposite Ph.D. -- B. Duggan
To generalize is to be an idiot. -- William Blake
To get something done, a committee should consist of no more than three men, two of them absent.
To invent, you need a good imagination and a pile of junk. -- Thomas Edison
To iterate is human, to recurse, divine.
To the best of my recollection, Senator, I can't recall.
To the systems programmer, users and applications serve only to provide a test load.
"To vacillate or not to vacillate, that is the question ... or is it?"
"To YOU I'm an atheist; to God, I'm the Loyal Opposition." -- Woody Allen
Today is a good day to bribe a high-ranking public official.
Today is National Existential Ennui Awareness Day.
Today is the first day of the rest of the mess
Today is the first day of the rest of your lossage.
Today is the tomorrow you worried about yesterday
"Today, of course, it is considered very poor taste to use the F-word except in major motion pictures."
Toilet Toup'ee, n.: Any shag carpet that causes the lid to become top-heavy, thus creating endless annoyance to male users. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
Tomorrow will be canceled due to lack of interest.
Tonight's the night: Sleep in a eucalyptus tree.
Too clever is dumb. -- Ogden Nash
Too much of a good thing is WONDERFUL. -- Mae West
Too much of everything is just enough. -- Bob Wier
Too often I find that the volume of paper expands to fill the available briefcases. -- Governor Jerry Brown
Travel important today; Internal Revenue men arrive tomorrow.
Troubled day for virgins over 16 who are beautiful and wealthy and live in eucalyptus trees.
Truly great madness can not be achieved without significant intelligence. -- Henrik Tikkanen
Truth is the most valuable thing we have -- so let us economize it. -- Mark Twain
Truth will be out this morning. (Which may really mess things up.)
Truthful, adj.: Dumb and illiterate. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Try not to have a good time ... This is supposed to be educational. -- Charles Schulz
Try to be the best of whatever you are, even if what you are is no good.
Try to get all of your posthumous medals in advance.
Trying to be happy is like trying to build a machine for which the only specification is that it should run noiselessly.
Trying to define yourself is like trying to bite your own teeth. -- Alan Watts
Trying to establish voice contact ... please ____yell into keyboard.
Turnaucka's Law: The attention span of a computer is only as long as its electrical cord.
Tussman's Law: Nothing is as inevitable as a mistake whose time has come.
TV is chewing gum for the eyes. -- Frank Lloyd Wright
Twenty Percent of Zero is Better than Nothing. -- Walt Kelly
Two can Live as Cheaply as One for Half as Long. -- Howard Kandel
Two percent of zero is almost nothing.
"Two sure ways to tell a sexy male; the first is, he has a bad memory. I forget the second."
Two wrongs don't make a right, but three lefts do.
"Ubi non accusator, ibi non judex."  (Where there is no police, there is no speed limit.) -- Roman Law, trans. Petr Beckmann (1971)
UFO's are for real: the Air Force doesn't exist.
Uncle Ed's Rule of Thumb: Never use your thumb for a rule. You'll either hit it with a hammer or get a splinter in it.
Uncle Ed's Rule of Thumb: Never use your thumb for a rule. You'll either hit it with a hammmer or get a splinter in it.
Under a government which imprisons any unjustly, the true place for a just man is also a prison. -- Henry David Thoreau
Under a government which imprisons any unjustly, the true place for a just man is also in prison. -- Henry David Thoreau
Under deadline pressure for the next week. If you want something, it can wait. Unless it's blind screaming paroxysmally hedonistic ...
Underlying Principle of Socio-Genetics: Superiority is recessive.
Unfair animal names:  -- tsetse fly -- bullhead -- booby -- duck-billed platypus -- sapsucker -- Clarence -- Gary Larson
Universe, n.: The problem.
unix soit qui mal y pense
UNIX was half a billion (500000000) seconds old on Tue Nov 5 00:53:20 1985 GMT (measuring since the time(2) epoch). -- Andy Tannenbaum
Unnamed Law: If it happens, it must be possible.
Unquestionably, there is progress. The average American now pays out twice as much in taxes as he formerly got in wages. -- H. L. Mencken
Usage: fortune -P [] -a [xsz] [Q: [file]] [rKe9] -v6[+] dataspec ... inputdir
User n.: A programmer who will believe anything you tell him.
USER, n.: The word computer professionals use when they mean "idiot." -- Dave Barry, "Claw Your Way to the Top"
Using TSO is like kicking a dead whale down the beach. -- S. C. Johnson
Vail's Second Axiom: The amount of work to be done increases in proportion to the amount of work already completed.
Valerie: Aww, Tom, you're going maudlin on me ... Tom: I reserve the right to wax maudlin as I wane eloquent ... -- Tom Chapin
Van Roy's Law: An unbreakable toy is useful for breaking other toys.
Veni, Vidi, Visa.
Very few profundities can be expressed in less than 80 characters.
Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent. -- Salvor Hardin
Virginia law forbids bathtubs in the house; tubs must be kept in the yard.
"Virtual" means never knowing where your next byte is coming from.
Virtue is its own punishment.
Vital papers will demonstrate their vitality by spontaneously moving from where you left them to where you can't find them.
Vitamin C deficiency is apauling
VMS is like a nightmare about RXS-11M.
Vote anarchist
Vote for ME -- I'm well-tapered, half-cocked, ill-conceived and TAX-DEFERRED!
VYARZERZOMANIMORORSEZASSEZANSERAREORSES?
  *** System shutdown message from root ***  System going down in 60 seconds  
"Wagner's music is better than it sounds." -- Mark Twain
Walk softly and carry a megawatt laser.
War hath no fury like a non-combatant. -- Charles Edward Montague
War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ketchup is a vegetable.
WARNING TO ALL PERSONNEL:  Firings will continue until morale improves.
WARNING TO ALL PERSONNEL:  Firings will continue until morale improves.
Warp 7 -- It's a law we can live with.
Washington [D.C.] is a city of Southern efficiency and Northern charm. -- John F. Kennedy
Waste not, get your budget cut next year.
Wasting time is an important part of living.
Watson's Law: The reliability of machinery is inversely proportional to the number and significance of any persons watching it.
We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars. -- Oscar Wilde
We are all worms. But I do believe I am a glowworm. -- Winston Churchill
We ARE as gods and might as well get good at it. -- Whole Earth Catalog
We are confronted with insurmountable opportunities. -- Walt Kelly, "Pogo"
"We are on the verge: Today our program proved Fermat's next-to-last theorem." -- Epigrams in Programming, ACM SIGPLAN Sept. 1982
"We are upping our standards ... so up yours." -- Pat Paulsen for President, 1988.
We can defeat gravity. The problem is the paperwork involved.
We can predict everything, except the future.
"We demand rigidly defined areas of doubt and uncertainty!" -- Vroomfondel
"We don't care. We don't have to. We're the Phone Company."
We don't know who discovered water, but we're certain it wasn't a fish.
We don't understand the software, and sometimes we don't understand the hardware, but we can *___see* the blinking lights!
We gave you an atomic bomb, what do you want, mermaids? -- I. I. Rabi to the Atomic Energy Commission
We have met the enemy, and he is us. -- Walt Kelly
We have only two things to worry about: That things will never get back to normal, and that they already have.
"We have reason to believe that man first walked upright to free his hands for masturbation." -- Lily Tomlin
We may not return the affection of those who like us, but we always respect their good judgement.
We must remember the First Amendment which protects any shrill jackass no matter how self-seeking. -- F. G. Withington
We really don't have any enemies. It's just that some of our best friends are trying to kill us.
We will have solar energy as soon as the utility companies solve one technical problem -- how to run a sunbeam through a meter.
We wish you a Hare Krishna We wish you a Hare Krishna We wish you a Hare Krishna And a Sun Myung Moon! -- Maxwell Smart
"We'll cross out that bridge when we come back to it later."
We're only in it for the volume. -- Black Sabbath
Weiler's Law: Nothing is impossible for the man who doesn't have to do it himself.
Weinberg's First Law: Progress is made on alternate Fridays.
Weinberg's Principle: An expert is a person who avoids the small errors while sweeping on to the grand fallacy.
Weiner's Law of Libraries: There are no answers, only cross references.
Welcome thy neighbor into thy fallout shelter. He'll come in handy if you run out of food. -- Dean McLaughlin.
"Well, if you can't believe what you read in a comic book, what *___can* you believe?!" -- Bullwinkle J. Moose [Jay Ward]
Westheimer's Discovery: A couple of months in the laboratory can frequently save a couple of hours in the library.
Wethern's Law: Assumption is the mother of all screw-ups.
What color is a chameleon on a mirror?
"What do you give a man who has everything?" the pretty teenager asked her mother. "Encouragement, dear," she replied.
What does "it" mean in the sentence "What time is it?"?
What does it mean if there is no fortune for you?
What garlic is to food, insanity is to art.
What garlic is to salad, insanity is to art.
What good is a ticket to the good life, if you can't find the entrance?
What good is having someone who can walk on water if you don't follow in his footsteps?
What I tell you three times is true.
What I want is all of the power and none of the responsibility.
"What I've done, of course, is total garbage." -- R. Willard, Pure Math 430a
What if everything is an illusion and nothing exists? In that case, I definitely overpaid for my carpet. -- Woody Allen, "Without Feathers"
What is a magician but a practising theorist? -- Obi-Wan Kenobi
What is mind? No matter. What is matter? Never mind. -- Thomas Hewitt Key, 1799-1875
"What is the robbing of a bank compared to the FOUNDING of a bank?" -- Bertold Brecht
"What is wanted is not the will to believe, but the will to find out, which is the exact opposite." -- Bertrand Russell, "Skeptical_Essays", 1928
What is worth doing is worth the trouble of asking somebody to do.
What makes the universe so hard to comprehend is that there's nothing to compare it with.
What sane person could live in this world and not be crazy? -- Ursula K. LeGuin
What the hell, go ahead and put all your eggs in one basket.
What the large print giveth, the small print taketh away.
What the world *really* needs is a good Automatic Bicycle Sharpener.
What this country needs is a dime that will buy a good five-cent bagel.
What this country needs is a dime that will buy a good five-cent bagel.
What this country needs is a good five cent ANYTHING!
What this country needs is a good five cent microcomputer.
What this country needs is a good five cent nickel.
What this country needs is a good five dollar plasma weapon.
What this world needs is a good five-dollar plasma weapon.
What use is magic if it can't save a unicorn? -- Peter S. Beagle, "The Last Unicorn"
What you don't know can hurt you, only you won't know it.
"What's another word for Thesaurus?" -- Steven Wright
"What's the use of a good quotation if you can't change it?" -- Dr. Who
"What's the use of a good quotation if you can't change it?" -- The Doctor
Whatever became of eternal truth?
Whatever is not nailed down is mine. What I can pry loose is not nailed down. -- Collis P. Huntingdon
"Whatever the missing mass of the universe is, I hope it's not cockroaches!" -- Mom
When a Banker jumps out of a window, jump after him -- that's where the money is. -- Robespierre
When a fellow says, "It ain't the money but the principle of the thing," it's the money. -- Kim Hubbard
When a fly lands on the ceiling, does it do a half roll or a half loop?
When all other means of communication fail, try words.
"When are you BUTTHEADS gonna learn that you can't oppose Gestapo tactics *with* Gestapo tactics?" -- Reuben Flagg
When asked by an anthropologist what the Indians called America before the white men came, an Indian said simply "Ours." -- Vine Deloria, Jr.
When does summertime come to Minnesota, you ask? Well, last year, I think it was a Tuesday.
When God endowed human beings with brains, He did not intend to guarantee them.
When I said "we", officer, I was referring to myself, the four young ladies, and, of course, the goat.
When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President. Now I'm beginning to believe it. -- Clarence Darrow
"When I was crossing the border into Canada, they asked if I had any firearms with me. I said, `Well, what do you need?'" -- Steven Wright
When I was in school, I cheated on my metaphysics exam: I looked into the soul of the boy sitting next to me. -- Woody Allen
When in doubt, do what the President does -- guess.
"When in doubt, tell the truth." -- Mark Twain
When in doubt, use brute force. -- Ken Thompson
When in panic, fear and doubt, Drink in barrels, eat, and shout.
When Marriage is Outlawed, Only Outlaws will have Inlaws.
When more and more people are thrown out of work, unemployment results. -- Calvin Coolidge
When someone says "I want a programming language in which I need only say what I wish done," give him a lollipop.
"When the going gets tough, the tough get empirical" -- Jon Carroll
When the government bureau's remedies don't match your problem, you modify the problem, not the remedy.
When the speaker and he to whom he is speaks do not understand, that is metaphysics. -- Voltaire
When the weight of the paperwork equals the weight of the plane, the plane will fly. -- Donald Douglas
When we are planning for posterity, we ought to remember that virtue is not hereditary. -- Thomas Paine
"When you are in it up to your ears, keep your mouth shut."
When you don't know what you are doing, do it neatly.
When you have an efficient government, you have a dictatorship. -- Harry Truman
"When you have to kill a man it costs nothing to be polite." -- Winston Curchill, On formal declarations of war
When you make your mark in the world, watch out for guys with erasers. -- The Wall Street Journal
When you try to make an impression, the chances are that is the impression you will make.
When you're not looking at it, this fortune is written in FORTRAN.
Whenever anyone says, "theoretically", they really mean, "not really". -- Dave Parnas
Whenever I hear anyone arguing for slavery, I feel a strong impulse to see it tried on him personally. -- A. Lincoln
Whenever people agree with me I always feel I must be wrong. -- Oscar Wilde
Whenever you find that you are on the side of the majority, it is time to reform. -- Mark Twain
Where there's a will, there's an Inheritance Tax.
Whether you can hear it or not The Universe is laughing behind your back -- National Lampoon, "Deteriorata"
Which is worse: ignorance or apathy? Who knows? Who cares?
While anyone can admit to themselves they were wrong, the true test is admission to someone else.
While having never invented a sin, I'm trying to perfect several.
While it may be true that a watched pot never boils, the one you don't keep an eye on can make an awful mess of your stove. -- Edward Stevenson
While money can't buy happiness, it certainly lets you choose your own form of misery.
While money doesn't buy love, it puts you in a great bargaining position.
While most peoples' opinions change, the conviction of their correctness never does.
While you don't greatly need the outside world, it's still very reassuring to know that it's still there.
While your friend holds you affectionately by both your hands you are safe, for you can watch both of his. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Whistler's Law: You never know who is right, but you always know who is in charge.
"Who cares if it doesn't do anything? It was made with our new Triple-Iso-Bifurcated-Krypton-Gate-MOS process ..."
Who messed with my anti-paranoia shot?
Who needs friends when you can sit alone in your room and drink?
Who's on first?
"Whom are you?" said he, for he had been to night school. -- George Ade
Whom computers would destroy, they must first drive mad.
Whom the gods wish to destroy they first call promising.
"Why are we importing all these highbrow plays like `Amadeus'? I could have told you Mozart was a jerk for nothing." -- Ian Shoales
"Why be a man when you can be a success?" -- Bertold Brecht
Why bother building any more nuclear warheads until we use the ones we have?
Why can't you be a non-conformist like everyone else?
Why did the Lord give us so much quickness of movement unless it was to avoid responsibility with?
Why did the Roman Empire collapse? What is the Latin for office automation?
Why do we have two eyes? To watch 3-D movies with.
Why does man kill? He kills for food. And not only food: frequently there must be a beverage. -- Woody Allen, "Without Feathers"
Why does New Jersey have more toxic waste dumps and California have more lawyers?  New Jersey had first choice.
Why don't elephants eat penguins ?  Because they can't get the wrappers off ...
"Why is it that we rejoice at a birth and grieve at a funeral? It is because we are not the person involved" -- Mark Twain
Why is the alphabet in that order? Is it because of that song?
"Why isn't there a special name for the tops of your feet?" -- Lily Tomlin
"Why must you tell me all your secrets when it's hard enough to love you knowing nothing?" -- Lloyd Cole and the Commotions
"Why was I born with such contemporaries?" -- Oscar Wilde
Wiker's Law: Government expands to absorb revenue and then some.
Williams and Holland's Law: If enough data is collected, anything may be proven by statistical methods.
Winter is the season in which people try to keep the house as warm as it was in the summer, when they complained about the heat.
Wit, n.: The salt with which the American Humorist spoils his cookery ... by leaving it out. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
With a gentleman I try to be a gentleman and a half, and with a fraud I try to be a fraud and a half. -- Otto von Bismark
With a rubber duck, one's never alone. -- "The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy"
With all the fancy scientists in the world, why can't they just once build a nuclear balm?
Without ice cream life and fame are meaningless.
Workers of the world, arise! You have nothing to lose but your chairs.
World War Three can be averted by adherence to a strictly enforced dress code!
Worst Month of 1981 for Downhill Skiing: August. The lines are the shortest, though. -- Steve Rubenstein
Worst Vegetable of the Year: The brussels sprout. This is also the worst vegetable of next year. -- Steve Rubenstein
"Would you tell me, please, which way I ought to go from here?"  "That depends a good deal on where you want to get to," said the Cat -- Lewis Carrol
Writing about music is like dancing about architecture. -- Frank Zappa
X-rated movies are all alike ... the only thing they leave to the imagination is the plot.
Xerox does it again and again and again and ...
Xerox never comes up with anything original.
"Yeah, but you're taking the universe out of context."
Year, n.: A period of three hundred and sixty-five disappointments. -- Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"
Yes, but every time I try to see things your way, I get a headache.
Yes, but which self do you want to be?
Yesterday I was a dog. Today I'm a dog. Tomorrow I'll probably still be a dog. Sigh! There's so little hope for advancement. -- Snoopy
Yesterday upon the stair I met a man who wasn't there. He wasn't there again today -- I think he's from the CIA.
Yield to Temptation ... it may not pass your way again. -- Lazarus Long, "Time Enough for Love"
Yinkel, n.: A person who combs his hair over his bald spot, hoping no one will notice. -- Rich Hall, "Sniglets"
You are a very redundant person, that's what kind of person you are.
You are here: *** *** ********* ******* ***** *** *  But you're not all there.
You are only young once, but you can stay immature indefinitely.
You are the only person to ever get this message.
You are wise, witty, and wonderful, but you spend too much time reading this sort of trash.
You buttered your bread, now lie in it.
"You can bring any calculator you like to the midterm, as long as it doesn't dim the lights when you turn it on." -- Hepler, Systems Design 182
You can create your own opportunities this week. Blackmail a senior executive.
"You can do this in a number of ways. IBM chose to do all of them. Why do you find that funny?" -- D. Taylor, Computer Science 350
You can get more of what you want with a kind word and a gun than you can with just a kind word. -- Bumper Sticker
You can learn many things from children. How much patience you have, for instance. -- Franklin P. Jones
You can make it illegal, but you can't make it unpopular.
You can measure a programmer's perspective by noting his attitude on the continuing viability of FORTRAN. -- Alan Perlis
You can only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.
You can tell how far we have to go, when FORTRAN is the language of supercomputers. -- Steven Feiner
You can tune a piano, but you can't tuna fish.
"You can write a small letter to Grandma in the filename." -- Forbes Burkowski, Computer Science 454
You can't carve your way to success without cutting remarks.
"You can't have everything. Where would you put it?" -- Steven Wright
You can't hold a man down without staying down with him. -- Booker T. Washington
You can't judge a book by the way it wears its hair.
"You can't make a program without broken egos."
You can't start worrying about what's going to happen. You get spastic enough worrying about what's happening now. -- Lauren Bacall
"You can't survive by sucking the juice from a wet mitten." -- Charles Schulz, "Things I've Had to Learn Over and Over and Over"
"You can't teach people to be lazy - either they have it, or they don't." -- Dagwood Bumstead
You cannot achieve the impossible without attempting the absurd.
You cannot kill time without injuring eternity.
You cannot propel yourself forward by patting yourself on the back.
You could get a new lease on life -- if only you didn't need the first and last month in advance.
You couldn't even prove the White House staff sane beyond a reasonable doubt. -- Ed Meese, on the Hinckley verdict
You do not have mail.
You don't have to think too hard when you talk to teachers. -- J. D. Salinger
You don't sew with a fork, so I see no reason to eat with knitting needles. -- Miss Piggy, on eating Chinese Food
You have a tendency to feel you are superior to most computers.
You have acquired a scroll entitled 'irk gleknow mizk'(n).--More--  This is an IBM Manual scroll.--More--  You are permanently confused. -- Dave Decot
You have an unusual magnetic personality. Don't walk too close to metal objects which are not fastened down.
You have junk mail.
You have the body of a 19 year old. Please return it before it gets wrinkled.
You have the capacity to learn from mistakes. You'll learn a lot today.
You know it's going to be a bad day when you want to put on the clothes you wore home from the party and there aren't any.
You know you have a small apartment when Rice Krispies echo. -- S. Rickly Christian
You know you're a little fat if you have stretch marks on your car. -- Cyrus, Chicago Reader 1/22/82
You know you've been spending too much time on the computer when your friend misdates a check, and you suggest adding a "++" to fix it.
You know you've landed gear-up when it takes full power to taxi.
You look like a million dollars. All green and wrinkled.
You may be recognized soon. Hide.
You may be sure that when a man begins to call himself a "realist," he is preparing to do something he is secretly ashamed of doing. -- Sydney Harris
You may easily play a joke on a man who likes to argue -- agree with him. -- Ed Howe
You may have heard that a dean is to faculty as a hydrant is to a dog. -- Alfred Kahn
You might have mail
"You must realize that the computer has it in for you. The irrefutable proof of this is that the computer always does what you tell it to do."
You need no longer worry about the future. This time tomorrow you'll be dead.
You never know how many friends you have until you rent a house on the beach.
You possess a mind not merely twisted, but actually sprained.
You probably wouldn't worry about what people think of you if you could know how seldom they do. -- Olin Miller.
You should emulate your heros, but don't carry it too far. Especially if they are dead.
You should never bet against anything in science at odds of more than about 10^12 to 1. -- Ernest Rutherford
You should never wear your best trousers when you go out to fight for freedom and liberty. -- Henrik Ibsen
You think Oedipus had a problem -- Adam was Eve's mother.
You too can wear a nose mitten.
You will be a winner today. Pick a fight with a four-year-old.
You will be attacked by a beast who has the body of a wolf, the tail of a lion, and the face of Donald Duck.
You will be surprised by a loud noise.
You will be Told about it Tomorrow. Go Home and Prepare Thyself.
You will feel hungry again in another hour.
You will lose your present job and have to become a door to door mayonnaise salesman.
You will think of something funnier than this to add to the fortunes.
You worry too much about your job. Stop it. You're not paid enough to worry.
"You'll never be the man your mother was!"
You're at the end of the road again.
You're being followed. Cut out the hanky-panky for a few days.
You're never too old to become younger. -- Mae West
You're not drunk if you can lie on the floor without holding on. -- Dean Martin
You're not my type. For that matter, you're not even my species!!!
You've been leading a dog's life. Stay off the furniture.
"You've got to have a gimmick if your band sucks." -- Gary Giddens
"You've got to think about tomorrow!"  "TOMORROW! I haven't even prepared for *_________yesterday* yet!"
Your analyst has you mixed up with another patient. Don't believe a thing he tells you.
Your conscience never stops you from doing anything. It just stops you from enjoying it.
Your fault: core dumped
Your life would be very empty if you had nothing to regret.
Your lucky color has faded.
Your lucky number has been disconnected.
Your lucky number is 3552664958674928. Watch for it everywhere.
Your true value depends entirely on what you are compared with.
"Yow! Am I having fun yet?" -- Zippy the Pinhead
YOW!! Everybody out of the GENETIC POOL!"
Zero Defects, n.: The result of shutting down a production line.
Zounds! I was never so bethumped with words since I first called my brother's father dad. -- William Shakespeare, "King John"
